CIK: 1100441
Company Name: RTI SURGICAL INC 
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2019-03-05
Accession Number: 0001193125-19-063391


Item 1 BUSINESS. Company Overview RTI Surgical is a global surgical implant company that designs, develops, manufactures and distributes biologic, metal and synthetic implants. Our implants are used in orthopedic, spine, sports medicine, general surgery, trauma and other surgical procedures to repair and promote the natural healing of human b1 and other human tissues and improve surgical outcomes. We manufacture metal and synthetic implants and process donated human musculoskeletal and other tissue and bovine and porcine animal tissue in producing allograft and xenograft implants using our proprietary BIOCLEANSE , TUTOPLAST and CANCELLE SP sterilization processes. We process tissue at our facilities in Alachua, Florida and Neunkirchen, Germany and manufacture metal and synthetic implants in Marquette, Michigan and Greenville, North Carolina. We are accredited in the U.S. by the American Association of Tissue Banks and we are a member of AdvaMed. Our implants are distributed directly to hospitals throughout the U.S. and in more than 40 countries worldwide with the support of both our and third party representatives as well as through larger purchasing companies. Strategy We are implementing a transformation strategy to increase focus on our spine and Original Equipment Manufacturer ( OEM ) operations and create long term, profitable growth for the company. In 2017, we introduced a new management team with extensive experience in an effort to spearhead these efforts. The core comp1nts of our strategy are Reduce Complexity. We are working to reduce complexity in our organization by divesting non core assets and investing in core competencies. Drive Operational Excellence. We are working to optimize material cost and drive operational efficiency to reduce other direct costs by pursuing world class manufacturing. Accelerate Growth. We are investing in innovative, niche high growth product categories leveraging core competency in the spine market; utilizing core technologies to expand OEM relationships and drive organic growth; and building relevant scale in our spinal portfolio to improve our importance to the consolidating healthcare market driven increasingly by integrated delivery ne2rks and group purchasing organizations. We distribute human tissue, bovine and porcine animal tissue, metal and synthetic implants through various distribution channels. We operate in 1 reportable segment composed of four lines of business. Effective January 1, 2018, the reporting of our lines of business is composed of four franchises or lines of business spine; sports; OEM and international. Our previous lines of business were composed of spine; sports medicine and orthopedics; surgical specialties; cardiothoracic; international; and OEM. Additionally, effective January 1, 2018, the other revenues category is included in the OEM line of business. The prior year comparable revenue information has been restated to conform to the current year presentation. We believe that the change in the reporting of our lines of business is aligned with our focused strategy of reducing complexity and better understanding of our lines of business. Discrete financial information is not available for these four lines of business. The following table presents revenues from these four franchises and their 1 Table of Contents respective percentages of our total revenues for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 Year Ended December 31, 2018 2017 2016 (In thousands) Revenues Spine $ 79,687 28.4 % $ 77,514 27.7 % $ 73,907 27.1 % Sports 54,533 19.4 % 57,211 20.5 % 54,609 20.0 % OEM 120,682 430 % 110,710 39.6 % 108,093 39.6 % International 25,953 9.2 % 25,964 9.3 % 25,109 9.2 % Cardiothoracic 0.0 % 8,164 29 % 11,147 4.1 % Total revenues $ 280,855 100.0 % $ 279,563 100.0 % $ 272,865 100.0 % For additional financial information concerning our operating performance, please refer to Management Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations in I, Item 7 of this report and our Consolidated Financial Statements in I, Item 8 of this report. Corporate Information We were incorporated in 1997 in Florida as a wholly owned subsidiary of the University of Florida Tissue Bank, ( UFTB ). We began operations on February 12, 1998 when UFTB contributed to us its allograft processing operations, related equipment and technologies, distribution arrangements, research and development activities and certain other assets. At the time of our initial public offering in August 2000, we reincorporated in the State of Delaware. In July 2013, we completed our acquisition of Pi1er Surgical Technology, Inc. ( Pi1er ) and, in connection with the acquisition, changed our name from RTI Biologics, Inc. to RTI Surgical, Inc. In August 2017, we completed the sale of substantially all of the assets related to our Cardiothoracic closure business (the CT Business ) to A&E Advanced Closure Systems, LLC (a subsidiary of A&E Medical Corporation) ( A&E ). On January 4, 2018, we acquired Zyga Technology, Inc. ( Zyga ) through the merger of 1 of our wholly owned subsidiaries with and into Zyga. On November 1, 2018, the Company entered into a definitive agreement to acquire Paradigm Spine, LLC ( Paradigm ) in a cash and stock transaction. Our principal offices are located at 11621 Research Circle, Alachua, Florida, and our ph1 number is (386) 418 8888. Industry Overview Defects in b1 and other human tissue can be caused by a variety of sources including trauma, congenital defects, aging, revision of joint replacements, infectious disease, cancer and other similar conditions. The predominant method used to repair injured or defective b1 and tissue is surgical intervention, primarily through the use of surgical implants. When considering a surgical procedure for b1 or tissue repair, surgeons and patients have a number of treatment options including metals and synthetics; xenograft tissue from an animal source; autograft tissue from the patient; and allograft tissue from another human donor. Depending on the specific surgery, surgeons may elect to use any number of these treatment options. We offer a broad line of metal, synthetic, xenograft and allograft solutions to meet their needs. Metals and Synthetics The medical community has used metal and synthetic materials for implant procedures for many years. Metal and synthetic technologies are used to create both surgical implants as well as instruments used in surgical procedures. These implants are used in a variety of procedures in spine, cardiothoracic, trauma and other areas. Typical metals used include surgical stainless steel and titanium. These materials are chosen for their strength and durability. Synthetic implants provide alternative implant options for surgeons and reliable availability due to the variable supply of xenograft, autograft and allograft. 1 common example of a synthetic material is polyetheretherket1 ( PEEK ). A recent trend has emerged for advanced materials in spinal interbodies. RTI Surgical has a position in that space through its Fortilink family of products, which is produced by additive manufacturing (3 D printing) using a proprietary polyetherket1ket1 (PEKK) material called TETRAfuse 3 D. The Company exclusive supplier of TETRAfuse 3 D is Oxford Performance Materials, Inc. 2 Table of Contents Xenograft Tissue Xenograft tissue based implants are common in many areas of medicine including cardiac and vascular procedures, soft tissue repair and wound care. Xenograft based implants are also used in the repair of b1 defects in orthopedic surgery as carriers for demineralized b1 matrix and b1 morphogenic protein products. The production of xenograft implants involves recovering animal tissue, typically from cattle (bovine) or pigs (porcine), processing and sterilization, and then transplanting the xenograft implant into a human patient. Autograft and Allograft Tissue Many surgeons use autograft and allograft tissue in their surgical procedures to take advantage of their natural characteristics. Autograft procedures involve a surgeon harvesting tissue from 1 part of a patient body for transplant to another part of the body. Allograft tissues are recovered from cadaveric donors, processed for certain intended uses and then transplanted by a surgeon into the patient body to make the needed repair. Autograft and allograft b1 implants are not only osteoconductive, meaning they provide a scaffold for new b1 to attach itself to, but can be osteoinductive as well, meaning they stimulate the growth of new tissue. Marketing and Distribution We market and distribute our implants through direct distribution channels and a combination of both exclusive and non exclusive OEM distributors depending upon the product category. Our implants are used in the following markets spine, sports medicine, orthobiologics, trauma, dental, plastic surgery and other surgical specialties. Our implants range from metals, synthetics, allografts and xenografts that are precision machined for specific surgical applications, to grafts conventionally processed for general surgical uses. Direct Channels Spine The human spine consists of four regions cervical (neck region), thoracic (back region attached to the ribs), lumbar (lower back), and sacral (tail b1). We design, manufacture, and distribute surgical implants, instruments, and biologics used in the treatment of conditions affecting the spine caused by degenerative conditions, deformities or traumatic injury. Our principal implant offering includes a wide variety of systems composed of comp1nts such as spine screws and rods, spinal spacers, plates, and various biologics offerings all designed to support, enhance, or promote spinal fusion. Our principal implant offerings by market segment are as follows Thoracolumbar Streamline TL Spinal Fixation System, Quantum Spinal Fixation System, Streamline MIS Spinal Fixation System, MIS Fusion TM Instrumentation, Contact Anterior Lumbar Plate System Cervical Streamline Posterior Cervical Spinal Fixation System, Slimfuse Anterior Cervical Plate System, Aspect Anterior Cervical Plate System Lateral Clarity Retractor System, Lat Fuse TM Lateral Plate System Interbody C Plus TM PEEK IBF System, Bullet TM PEEK IBF System, Cross Fuse II PEEK VBR IBF System Biologics The BioSet DBM, BioReady DBM, and BioAdapt DBM families of paste implants Synthetics nanOss advanced b1 graft substitute Sports Many repetitive use and sports related injuries can be addressed with allograft implants. The most prevalent surgeries in the knee include repairs to the anterior cruciate ligament ( ACL ), articular cartilage repair, and meniscus transplantation. The most prevalent surgeries in the shoulder include rotator cuff repair and articular cartilage repair. Our principal sports medicine allografts are tendons for ligament reconstruction, fresh osteochondral grafts for cartilage repair, and our meniscal allografts for advanced meniscus injuries. Many of our sports medicine tendon allografts utilize our patented pre shaped technology, which greatly reduces preparation time in the operating room and are generally easier to implant than non pre shaped allografts. We also distribute Matrix HD human dermis implants for wound repair and soft tissue augmentation and map3 cellular allogeneic b1 graft for foot and ankle repair. We also market and distribute implants for abdominal wall repair, and plastic and reconstructive surgery. These implants are processed through our validated Tutoplast tissue sterilization process, which has a proven track record of safety and performance. Principal products include Cortiva human dermis, Fortiva porcine dermis and 3 Table of Contents Tutopatch and Tutomesh bovine pericardium. OEM Channels We also market and distribute our implants through relationships with OEM distributors. Our spine interbody allograft implants are marketed and distributed domestically through our non exclusive relationships with Aesculap Implant Systems, Inc. ( Aesculap ), Integra Life Sciences Corporation ( Integra ), Medtronic, PLC ( Medtronic ), Orthofix International NV ( Orthofix ), Stryker Spine, a division of Stryker Corporation ( Stryker ), and Zimmer Biomet Holdings, Inc. ( Zimmer ). Our allograft paste implants are marketed and distributed under Puros DBM by Zimmer and BIO DBM by Stryker. Our surgical specialty implants are marketed and distributed through distributors including Integra for dural repair applications; Davol, Inc., a subsidiary of C. R. Bard, Inc. ( Davol ) for hernia repair and breast reconstruction; Katena Products, Inc. ( Katena ) for ophthalmology and Coloplast A S of Denmark ( Coloplast ) for urology. Our allograft dental implants including cancellous and cortical b1 and human and bovine membranes primarily for dental procedures related to augmenting ridge restoration are distributed exclusively by Zimmer. Our trauma implants are distributed through Zimmer and DePuy Synthes ( Synthes ), a Johnson & Johnson Inc. subsidiary. Zimmer across all implants represents approximately 21% of our total revenues. Effective August 3, 2017, our cardiothoracic hardware implants are distributed through A&E. International Internationally we market and distribute our implants through a direct distribution organization and a ne2rk of independent distributors. Cardiothoracic On August 3, 2017, we completed the sale of substantially all of the assets related to our CT Business to A&E. We now serve as an OEM to A&E, who provides surgeons cardiothoracic cable and plating systems. The Company retained all rights to its Cardiothoracic biologic implant. Cardiothoracic hardware implants offer increased stability and rigidity for sternal closures, ranging from routine closures to complex, high risk closures. The cardiothoracic biologic implant reinforces soft tissue where weakness exists in general, as well as for repair of pericardial structures. The BIOCLEANSE Tissue Sterilization Process We have developed and utilized in the United States the patented BIOCLEANSE tissue sterilization process, which is an automated, pharmaceutical grade chemical sterilization process for musculoskeletal b1 and certain soft tissue. This process is fully validated to kill or inactivate all classes of conventional pathogens, viruses, microbes, bacteria and fungi. Our BIOCLEANSE process is able to remove greater than 99% of the blood, fats, lipids and other unwanted materials from the tissue we process. An important element of the BIOCLEANSE process is that while it removes unwanted materials embedded within the tissue, it maintains the tissue structural integrity and compression strength. Studies have shown that b1 tissue sterilized with the BIOCLEANSE process maintains the same compression strength as untreated tissue. The BIOCLEANSE process has been reviewed by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration ( FDA ) which concluded that BIOCLEANSE was a validated tissue sterilization process demonstrated to prevent contamination of tissue grafts. To our knowledge, no other tissue sterilization process related to human tissue in our industry has been reviewed or approved by the FDA. It should be noted that the FDA does not have a formal approval process in place for tissue related processing techniques. 2 types of preserved allografts are processed using the BIOCLEANSE process soft tissue, consisting of tendons and cartilage; and b1 tissue, consisting of various configurations of cancellous and cortical b1 material. Tendons and cartilage are used to repair replace native tissue primarily in sports medicine reconstructive surgeries. Processed cortical and cancellous b1 materials are used in a wide variety of applications in spine and orthopedic surgeries. 4 Table of Contents The TUTOPLAST Tissue Sterilization Process The TUTOPLAST tissue sterilization process utilizes solvent dehydration and chemical inactivation to remove blood, lipids and extraneous materials, and inactivate viruses and break down RNA and DNA into fragments not capable of replication and disease transmission while preserving the biological and mechanical properties. 2 types of preserved allografts are processed using the TUTOPLAST process soft tissue, consisting of fascia lata, pericardium, dermis, sclera and cornea; and b1 tissue, consisting of various configurations of cancellous and cortical b1 material. Processed pericardium, fascia lata and dermis are collagenous tissue used to repair, replace or line native connective tissue primarily in dental, ophthalmology, urology, plastic and reconstructive surgeries. Dermis is also used in hernia repair and pelvic floor reconstruction. Sclera and cornea are used in ophthalmology procedures such as anterior and posterior segment patch grafting applications for glaucoma, retina and trauma surgery and oculoplastics, as well as contour wrapping of an orbital implant. Processed cortical and cancellous b1 material is used in a wide variety of applications in spine, orthopedic and dental surgeries. The CANCELLE SP DBM Sterilization Process DBM based pastes and putties are sterilized through the CANCELLE SP process, which is designed to preserve protein activity. In their final form, the DBM implants serve as b1 void fillers in many applications, including spinal, general orthopedic, joint reconstruction and dental surgeries. CANCELLE SP is a proprietary process that sterilizes DBM pastes and putties while simultaneously allowing them to maintain their osteoinductive ( OI ) potential, which is verified by 100 percent lot testing after sterilization. The determination of OI potential is made by lot release animal studies or testing for certain protein markers. These tests are not necessarily predictive of human clinical results. Through a combination of oxidative treatments and acid or alcohol washes, debris is removed and pathogens are inactivated. Cleansing rinses remove residual chemicals, maintaining biocompatibility and preserving the utility of the graft. The CANCELLE SP irradiation dose is delivered terminally for most pastes and putties to achieve device level sterility ( SAL 10 6 ). Tissue Recovery Tissue recovery is the actual removal of tissue from a donor after legal authorization has been obtained. Authorization is obtained by the tissue recovery group. We contract with independent FDA registered tissue recovery groups that specialize in this activity. Tissue recovery personnel aseptically recover tissue within 24 hours following a donor death, using surgical instruments and sterile techniques similar to those used in hospitals for routine surgery. Recovered tissue is placed on wet or dry ice, then transported by the donor recovery agency to the tissue processor or possibly a research institution. Under U.S. law, human tissue cannot be bought and sold. However, the law permits the recovery of reasonable payments for the provision of certain services, such as those involved in recovering, processing and storing tissue and related to the advancement of tissue processing technologies; all types of activities in which we are involved. Donor recovery groups recover a variety of tissue types from donors including the fibula, femur, tibia, humerus, ilium, pericardium, fascia lata, dermis, costal cartilage, sclera, tendons and ligaments. We believe that our established relationships with recovery organizations are sufficient to meet the ongoing operation demands for the next twelve months. These contracted tissue recovery organizations are responsible for obtaining appropriate authorization and conducting federally mandated donor screening, such as a donor risk assessment interview ( DRAI ) with the next of kin. Each donor is evaluated against current acceptance criteria prior to donor tissue being sent to our processing facility. Upon receipt of the tissue, we conduct pre processing donor screening to determine donor medical suitability for transplantation. Pre processing screening performed by us includes laboratory testing and a donor medical eligibility assessment. With respect to laboratory testing, we perform an extensive panel of serological and microbiological tests using Clinical Laboratory Improvements Amendment ( CLIA ) approved laboratories and FDA test kits. These results are subject to stringent criteria in order to release the donor tissue to the processing stage. We have relationships with tissue donor recovery agencies across the United States. We also have relationships outside the United States. We believe additional recovery group relationships would be available if needed and consequently that the loss of any 1 of our sources of donor tissue would not have a material impact on our operating results. We continue to develop new xenograft tissue implants. Implants processed from xenograft tissue are regulated by the 5 Table of Contents FDA as devices and require approval or licenses from the FDA prior to marketing in the United States. The sources of our bovine animal tissues are regulated closed herds. We believe that our established relationships with our sources of xenograft animal tissues are sufficient to meet our demands for our ongoing operations for the next twelve months. We believe the continued development of our xenograft implants will help us meet unmet demand for certain allografts and also allow us to develop new biological implants that cannot currently be made due to structural limitations of human tissue. Research and Development Our research and development ( R&D ) costs for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 were $14.4 million, $134 million and $16.1 million, respectively. In 2018, we continued to invest in our R&D efforts by funding new projects including research and development projects at our facilities in our US locations and in Neunkirchen, Germany. We plan to continue to develop new implants, technologies and surgical techniques within our current markets, and to develop additional technologies for other markets to address unmet clinical needs. We plan to do this by building on our core technology platforms TETRAfuse 3 D, BIOCLEANSE , TUTOPLAST , CANCELLE SP, precision machining, assembled grafts, tissue mediated osteoinduction and our metal and synthetics design and production expertise. We are working to develop differentiated technologies and investing in generating the necessary clinical data to drive demand and support appropriate reimbursement. We operate a dedicated research team working on advanced technologies, and have embedded development technical teams who work with the business marketing teams focused on expanding the scope and scale of existing competencies such as tissue machining and sterilization, and metal and synthetics manufacturing to meet specific surgical needs. This approach has resulted in the development of core science platforms, a pipeline of concepts for development and marketing, and focused projects to meet immediate needs. In 2018, we launched 6 new implants and product enhancements in spine, sports, and general orthopedics developed by our research and development teams. January 2018 marked the first clinical use of the Fortilink TS and Fortilink L product systems, which were followed by the full commercial launch of the Fortilink TS system in May 2018. The Fortilink systems are the second and third in a family of devices to incorporate our TETRAfuse 3D Technology. Additionally, 2018 began the manufacture and initial commercial use of the Thorecon sternal closure system in association with our partner A&E. The ViB1 biologic product was introduced to the RTI market space through a focused and exclusive partnership with Aziyo Biologics. Enhancements were made to Streamline OCT system, continuing the history of continuously improved features and options; performance improvements were made to our synthetic biologic line with the release of nanOss 3D Plus. Intellectual Property Our business depends upon the significant know how and proprietary technology we have developed. To protect this know how and proprietary technology, we rely on a combination of trade secret laws, patents, licenses, trademarks and confidentiality agreements. The effect of these intellectual property rights is to define z1s of exclusive use of the covered intellectual property. The duration of patent rights generally is 20 years from the date of filing of priority application, while trademarks, once registered, are essentially perpetual. Our trademarks and service marks provide us and our implants with a certain amount of brand recognition in our markets. However, we do not consider any single patent, trademark or service mark material to our business strategy, financial condition or results of operations. We have also entered into exclusive and non exclusive licenses relating to a wide array of third party technologies. In addition, we rely on our substantial body of know how, including proprietary tissue recovery techniques and processes, research and development, tissue processing and quality assurance. Our proprietary BIOCLEANSE , TUTOPLAST and CANCELLE SP sterilization processes are covered by 1 or more U.S. and or foreign patents, patent applications or trade secrets. Other U.S. and foreign holdings include, without limitation, patents, patent applications or trade secrets relating to or covering certain precision machined allograft intervertebral spacers and other spinal implants; matrix compositions including various b1 graft substitutes; membrane tissue implants; and ligament, tendon or meniscus reconstruction and repair with certain precision shaped and or assembled b1 and soft tissue implants, synthetic b1 graft substitutes; interbody fusion and motion implants; spinal and orthopedic plates; spinal rods, cables and screws and spinal fixation systems and related instrumentation. The medical device industry is characterized by the existence of a large number of patents and frequent litigation based on allegations of patent infringement. As the number of entrants into our market increases, the risk of an infringement claim against us, as well as the risk of a third party infringing on our patents, grows. While we attempt to ensure that our implants and methods do not infringe other parties patents and proprietary rights, our competitors may assert that our implants, and the methods we employ, are covered by patents held by them. In addition, our competitors may assert that future implants and methods we may employ infringe their patents. If third parties claim that we infringe upon their intellectual property rights, we 6 Table of Contents may incur liabilities and costs and may have to redesign or discontinue selling the affected implant. Even if we were to prevail, any litigation could be costly and time consuming and would divert the attention of our management and key personnel from our business operations. We have in the past been, and may in the future be, involved in litigation relating to our intellectual property. Competition Competition in the medical implant industry is intense and subject to rapid technological change and evolving industry requirements and standards. Companies within the industry compete on the basis of design of related instrumentation, efficacy of implants, relationships with the surgical community, depth of range of implants, scientific and clinical results and pricing. Many of our competitors are substantially larger than we are, with much greater resources. Our principal competitors in the conventional allograft market include the Musculoskeletal Transplant Foundation ( MTF ), AlloSource Inc., Community Tissue Services ( CTS ), LifeLink Tissue Bank ( LifeLink ), JRF Ortho ( JRF ), LifeCell, Inc., a subsidiary of Allergan PLC and LifeNet Health, Inc. ( LifeNet ). Among our competitors in precision machined allograft are MTF, LifeNet and AlloSource. Other companies who process and distribute allograft pastes include Medtronic, AlloSource, Integra LifeSciences Holdings Corp. ( Integra ), Wright Medical Inc. and MTF. Companies who process and distribute xenograft tissue include Baxter, Inc., LifeCell, Cook Surgical and Medtronic. We consider our principal competitors in the metal and synthetic markets to include Medtronic, Stryker, Zimmer Biomet, Depuy Synthes, Globus Medical Group, Inc. ( Globus ), K2M Group Holdings Inc. ( K2 ), NuVasive, Inc. ( NuVasive ), Alphatec Holdings Inc. ( Alphatec ), Spinal Elements ( Spinal ), Xtant Medical Holdings, Inc. ( Xtant ), SeaSpine Holdings Corporation ( SeaSpine ), and Orthofix International NV ( Orthofix ). Government Regulation and Corporate Compliance Government Regulation Government regulation plays a significant role in the processing manufacturing and distribution of allograft tissue implants and medical devices. We procure, where applicable, process manufacture, and market our allograft tissue implants and medical devices worldwide. Although some standards of harmonization exist, each country in which we do business has its own specific regulatory requirements. These requirements are dynamic in nature and, as such, are continually changing. New regulations may be promulgated at any time and with limited notice. While we believe that we are in material compliance with all existing pertinent international and domestic laws and regulations, there can be no assurance that changes in governmental administrations and regulations, or their interpretation or application, will not adversely affect our operations. Failure to comply with applicable requirements could result in fines, injunctions, civil penalties, recall or seizure of products, suspension of production, inability to market current products, criminal prosecution, and or refusal of the government to authorize the marketing of new products. In the United States, most of our allograft implants are regulated by the FDA solely under Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations ( CFR ), Parts 1270 and 1271, Current Good Tissue Practice for Human Cell, Tissue, and Cellular and Tissue Based Products ( cGTPs ). Xenograft tissues and some of our allograft containing implants are regulated as medical devices and subject to FDA 21 CFR, Part 820 Current Good Manufacturing Practices (GMPs) for Medical Devices and related statutes from the FDA. In addition, our U.S. operation is subject to certain state and local regulations, as well as compliance to the standards of the tissue bank industry accrediting organization, the American Association of Tissue Banks ( AATB ). In Germany, allografts are classified as drugs and the German government regulates such implants in accordance with German Drug Law. On April 7, 2004, the European Commission issued a human tissue directive to regulate allografts within the European Union ( EU ). Our Neunkirchen facility is presently licensed by the German Health Authorities and in compliance with applicable international laws and regulations, allowing us to market our human and animal tissue implants globally. The FDA and international regulatory bodies conduct periodic compliance inspections of both our U.S. and our German processing facilities. All operations are registered with the U.S. FDA Center for Devices and Radiological Health ( CDRH ) for device manufacturing locations and Center for Biologics Evaluation and Research ( CBER ) for human tissue recovery, processing and distribution locations and are certified to ISO 134852003 and transitioning to ISO 134852016. The Alachua facility is also accredited by the AATB and is licensed in the states of Florida, New York, California, Maryland, Delaware and Illinois. The Neunkirchen facility is registered with the German Health Authority 7 Table of Contents ( BfArM ) as a pharmaceutical and medical device manufacturer and is subject to German Drug Law. We believe that worldwide regulation of allografts and xenografts is likely to intensify as the international regulatory community focuses on the growing demand for these implants and the attendant safety and efficacy issues of citizen recipients. We currently market and distribute allografts that are subject to the FDA Human Tissue Intended for Transplantation and Human Cells, Tissues, and Cellular and Tissue Based Products regulations. Under these regulations, we are required to perform donor screening and infectious disease testing and to document this screening and testing for each donor from whom we process tissue, and to process tissues in compliance with cGTP. The FDA has authority under the rules to inspect human tissue processing facilities, and to detain, recall, or destroy tissues for which appropriate documentation and evidence of compliance is not available. We are not required to obtain pre market approval or clearance from the FDA for allografts that meet the regulation definition of human tissue. The FDA may regulate certain allografts as medical devices, drugs, or biologics, which would require that we obtain approval or product licensure from the FDA. This would occur in those cases where the allograft is deemed to have been more than minimally manipulated or indicated for non homologous use. In general, homologous use occurs when tissue is used for the same basic function that it fulfilled in the donor. The definitional criteria for making these determinations appear in the FDA rules. If the FDA decides that certain of our current or future allografts are more than minimally manipulated or indicated for non homologous use, it would require licensure, approval or clearances of those allografts. Allografts requiring such pre market review are subject to pervasive and continuing regulation by the FDA. We would be required to list these allografts as a drug, as a medical device, or as a biologic, and to manufacture them in specifically registered or licensed facilities in accordance with FDA regulation Current Good Manufacturing Practices . We would also be subject to post marketing surveillance and reporting requirements. In addition, our manufacturing facilities and processes would be subject to periodic inspection to assess compliance with cGMPs. Our labeling and promotional activities would be subject to scrutiny by the FDA and, in certain instances, by the Federal Trade Commission. The export of drugs, devices, and biologics is also subject to more intensive regulation than is the case for human tissue implants. Our research, development and clinical programs, as well as our manufacturing and marketing operations, are subject to extensive regulation in the United States and other countries. Most notably, all of our implants distributed in the United States are subject to the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act and the Public Health Services Act as implemented and enforced by the FDA. The regulations that cover our implants and facilities vary widely based on implant type and classification both in the United States, and from country to country. The amount of time required to obtain approvals or clearances from regulatory authorities also differs from country to country. Unless an exemption applies, each medical device that we wish to commercially distribute in the United States will be covered by premarket notification ( 510(k) ) clearance from the FDA. The FDA classifies medical devices into 1 of 3 classes. Devices deemed to pose lower risks are placed in either Class I or II, with the Class II devices typically requiring the manufacturer to submit to the FDA a premarket notification requesting permission to commercially distribute the device. This process is generally known as 510(k) clearance. Some low risk devices are exempted from this requirement. Devices deemed by the FDA to pose the greatest risks, such as life sustaining, life supporting or implantable devices, or devices deemed not substantially equivalent to a previously cleared 510(k) device, are placed in Class III, requiring approval through the lengthy premarket approval application ( PMA ) process. Manufacturers of most Class II medical devices are required to obtain 510(k) clearance prior to marketing their devices. To obtain 510(k) clearance, a company must submit a premarket notification demonstrating that the proposed device is substantially equivalent in intended use and in technological and performance characteristics to another legally marketed 510(k) cleared predicate device. By regulation, the FDA performance goals are to clear or deny a 510(k) premarket notification within 90 FDA review days of submission of the application. As a practical matter, clearance may take longer. The FDA may require further information, including clinical data, to make a determination regarding substantial equivalence. After a device receives 510(k) clearance, any modification that could significantly affect its safety or effectiveness, or that would constitute a major change in its intended use, requires a new 510(k) clearance or could require a PMA approval. Class III medical devices are required to undergo the PMA approval process in which the manufacturer must establish the safety and effectiveness of the device to the FDA satisfaction. A PMA application must provide extensive preclinical and clinical trial data as well as information about the device and its comp1nts regarding, among other things, device design, manufacturing, and labeling. Also, during the review period, an advisory panel of experts from outside the FDA may be convened to review and evaluate the application and provide recommendations to the FDA as to the approvability of the device. In addition, the FDA will typically conduct a preapproval inspection of the manufacturing facility to ensure compliance with Quality System Regulations ( QSR ). FDA reviews of PMA applications generally can take between 1 and 3 years, or longer. 8 Table of Contents The medical devices that we develop, manufacture, distribute, and market are subject to rigorous regulation by the FDA and numerous other federal, state, and foreign governmental authorities. The process of obtaining FDA clearance and other regulatory approvals to develop and market a medical device, particularly from the FDA, can be costly and time consuming, and there can be no assurance that such approvals will be granted on a timely basis, if at all. While we believe that we have obtained, or will be able to obtain, all necessary clearances and approvals for the manufacture and sale of our implants and that they are, or will be, in material compliance with applicable FDA and other material regulatory requirements, there can be no assurance that we will be able to continue such compliance. After an implant is placed on the market, numerous regulatory requirements continue to apply. Those regulatory requirements may include, as applicable product listing and establishment registration; Quality System Regulations, which requires manufacturers, including third party manufacturers, to follow stringent design, testing, control, documentation and other quality assurance procedures during all aspects of the manufacturing process; labeling regulations (including unique device identification ( UDI ) requirements), and FDA prohibitions against the promotion of products for uncleared, unapproved, or off label uses or indications; clearance of product modifications that could significantly affect safety or efficacy or that would constitute a major change in intended use of 1 of our cleared devices; Medical Device Reporting regulations, which require that manufacturers report to FDA if their device may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury, or has malfuncti1d in a way that would likely cause or contribute to a death or serious injury if the malfunction of the device or a similar device were to recur; post approval restrictions or conditions, including post approval study commitments; post market surveillance regulations, which apply when necessary to protect the public health or to provide additional safety and effectiveness data for the device; the FDA recall authority, whereby it can ask, or under certain conditions order, device manufacturers to recall from the market a product that is in violation of governing laws and regulations; regulations pertaining to voluntary recalls; and notices of corrections or removals. We and certain of our suppliers also are subject to announced and unannounced inspections by the FDA to determine our compliance with FDA QSR and other regulations. If the FDA were to find that we or certain of our suppliers have failed to comply with applicable regulations, the agency could institute a wide variety of enforcement actions, ranging from a public Warning Letter to more severe sanctions such as fines and civil penalties against us, our officers, our employees or our suppliers; unanticipated expenditures to address or defend such actions; delays in clearing or approving, or refusal to clear or approve, our products; withdrawal or suspension of approval of our products or those of our third party suppliers by the FDA or other regulatory bodies; product recall or seizure; interruption of production; operating restrictions; injunctions; and criminal prosecution. Moreover, governmental authorities outside the United States have become increasingly stringent in their regulation of medical devices, and our products may become subject to more rigorous regulation by non U.S. governmental authorities in the future. U.S. or non U.S. government regulations may be imposed in the future that may have a material adverse effect on our business and operations. The European Union has nationally transposed regulations based on the European Commission ( EC ) Medical Device Directives for the control of medical devices with which manufacturers must comply. New medical device regulation ( MDR ) will replace the medical device directives effective May 26, 2020. Under the current directives and upcoming MDR, manufacturing plants must have received Conformit Europ ene ( CE ) certification from a notified body in order to be able to sell products within the member states of the European Union. Certification allows manufacturers to stamp the products of certified plants with a CE mark. Products covered by the EC directives that do not bear the CE mark cannot be sold or distributed within the European Union. We have received certification for all currently existing manufacturing facilities and products that we distribute in the European Union. Our products may be reimbursed by third party payers, such as government programs, including Medicare, Medicaid, and Tricare or private insurance plans and healthcare ne2rks. Third party payers may deny reimbursement if they determine that a device provided to a patient or used in a procedure does not meet applicable payment criteria or if the policy holder healthcare insurance benefits are limited. Also, third party payers may challenge the medical necessity and prices paid for our products and services. The False Claims Act, Anti Kickback Statute, Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, and United Kingdom Bribery Act of 2010, as well as state and international anti bribery and anti corruption legislation, regulate the conduct of medical device companies interactions with the healthcare industry. Among other things, these laws and others generally (1) prohibit the provision of anything of value in exchange for the referral of patients for, or the purchase, order, or recommendation of, any item or service reimbursed by a federal healthcare program, (including Medicare and Medicaid); (2) require that claims for payment submitted to federal healthcare programs be truthful; and (3) prohibit inappropriate payment to foreign officials for the purpose of obtaining or retaining business. RTI maintains a Compliance Program that incorporates the seven fundamental elements as set forth by the Office of the Inspector General within the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services. This facilitates RTI compliance with requirements regarding the prohibition of inappropriate transfers of value in exchange for referrals or obtaining or retaining foreign business engagements, prohibition regarding the submission of 9 Table of Contents inappropriate claims for reimbursement to federal healthcare programs, as well as generally ensuring ethical interactions with the healthcare industry both domestically and internationally. Under Section 6002 of The Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act of 2010 (known as the Physician Payment Sunshine Act) and similar state and international transparency reporting legislation, RTI is required to collect data regarding payments or other transfers of value to physicians, teaching hospitals, and other persons in the healthcare industry. RTI Compliance Program ensures all such payments and transfers of value are appropriate per the requirements of applicable anti bribery or anti corruption legislation and that all required data is reported to relevant governmental entities as called for by applicable transparency reporting legislation. In addition, U.S. federal, state, and international laws protect the confidentiality of certain health information, in particular individually identifiable information such as medical records and restrict the use and disclosure of that protected information. RTI complies with the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 ( HIPAA ) due to its status as a covered entity related to the provision of a health plan for its employees. RTI is not otherwise regulated by HIPAA, but voluntarily incorporates many HIPAA standards in its corporate policies regarding handling of health data it receives. At the international level, the General Data Protection Regulation ( GDPR ) (EU 2016 679) applies to RTI processing of personal data of residents of the European Union. This law protects processing of all personal data by regulating collection, use, and disclosure as well as privacy and security requirements and imposes penalties for violations. RTI complies with this regulation for both general personal data as well as the higher sensitivity standards for health data and is implementing the standards of this regulation as part of corporate policy for processing of personal data from all jurisdictions. During the third quarter of 2018, we decided to stop procurement, manufacturing and distributing the map3 implants. This activity was completed in the fourth quarter of 2018, with frequent and transparent communication to the FDA. The map3 product is now off the market. Effective May 26, 2020, the European Union new MDR will replace the current medical device directives. All medical devices currently distributed in the European Union under the medical device directives are likely impacted. The MDR may also include products, such as human tissue, not traditionally considered medical devices in the European Union. Additionally, the MDR, among other things, increases regulatory requirements for several medical device groupings applicable to our implants distributed in the European Union, including strengthening notified body oversight for Class I reusable surgical instruments, and up classifying spinal devices in contact with the spinal column. Corporate Compliance We have a comprehensive compliance program. It is a fundamental policy of our company to conduct business in accordance with the highest ethical and legal standards. Our corporate compliance and ethics program is designed to promote legal compliance and ethical business practices throughout our domestic and international businesses. Our compliance program is designed to substantially meet U.S. Sentencing Commission Guidelines for effective organizational compliance and ethics programs and to prevent and detect violations of applicable federal, state and local laws. Our compliance program is additionally responsible for compliance with relevant international laws and implementation of corporate programs to ensure compliance with multi jurisdictional legislation on similar topics, i.e. HIPAA and GDPR. Key elements of our compliance program include Organizational oversight by senior level personnel responsible for the compliance functions within our company. Written standards and procedures, including a Code of Conduct. Methods for communicating compliance concerns, including anonymous reporting mechanisms. Investigation and remediation measures to ensure prompt response to reported matters and timely corrective action. Compliance education and training for employees and contracted business associates such as distributors. Auditing and monitoring controls to promote compliance with applicable laws and assess program effectiveness. Oversight of interactions with healthcare professionals to ensure compliance with healthcare fraud & abuse laws, including mandated reporting of transfers of value to healthcare professionals under the Affordable Care Act. 10 Table of Contents Oversight of corporate handling of personal data to ensure compliance with data protection legislation. Disciplinary guidelines to enforce compliance and address violations. Screening of employees and relevant contracted business associates. Risk assessments to identify areas of regulatory compliance risk. Environmental Our allografts and xenografts, as well as the chemicals used in processing natural tissues and also in the manufacturing of metal and synthetic implants, are handled and disposed of in accordance with country specific, federal, provincial, regional, state and or local regulations, as applicable. We contract with independent, third parties to perform all gamma irradiation of our surgical implants. In view of the engagement of a third party to perform irradiation services, the requirements for compliance with radiation hazardous waste do not apply, and therefore we do not anticipate that having any material adverse effect upon our capital expenditures, results of operations or financial condition. However, we are responsible for assuring that the service is being performed in accordance with applicable regulations. Employees As of December 31, 2018, we had a total of 891 employees of which 142 were employed outside of the United States. Management believes its relations with its employees are good. Available Information Our Internet address is www.rtix.com. Information included on our website is not incorporated by reference in our Form 10 K. We make available, free of charge, on or through the investor relations portion of our website, our annual reports on Form 10 K, quarterly reports on Form 10 Q and current reports on Form 8 K and amendments to such reports filed or furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the Exchange Act ), as soon as reasonably practicable after we file such material with, or furnish it to the Securities and Exchange Commission ( SEC ). These filings are also available on the SEC website at www.sec.gov. Also available on our website is our Corporate Governance Guidelines, our Code of Conduct, our Code of Ethics for Senior Financial Professionals, and the charters for our Audit Committee, Compensation Committee, Nominating and Governance Committee and Science and Technology Committee. Within the time period required by the SEC and Nasdaq, we will post any amendment to our Code of Ethics for our senior financial professionals and any waiver of our Code of Conduct applicable to our senior financial professionals, executive officers and directors. On November 1, 2018, we entered into a definitive agreement to acquire Paradigm in a cash and stock transaction valued at up to $300.0 million, consisting of $150.0 million at closing plus potential future milest1 payments. Established in 2005, Paradigm primary product is the coflex Interlaminar Stabilization device, a differentiated and minimally invasive motion preserving stabilization implant that is FDA premarket approved for the treatment of moderate to severe (LSS) in conjunction with decompression. The transaction is expected to close by the end of the first quarter of 2019 and is subject to the satisfaction of customary closing conditions and applicable regulatory approvals. 11 Table of Contents Item 1A. RISK FACTORS An investment in our common stock involves a high degree of risk. You should consider each of the risks and uncertainties described in this section and all of the other information in this document before deciding to invest in our common stock. Any of the risk factors we describe below could severely harm our business, financial condition and results of operations. The market price of our common stock could decline if any of these risks or uncertainties develops into actual events and you may lose all or part of your investment. We depend heavily upon sources of human tissue, and any failure to obtain tissue from these sources in a timely manner will interfere with our ability to process and distribute allografts. The supply of human tissue has at times limited our growth, and may not be sufficient to meet our future needs. In addition, due to seasonal changes in mortality rates, some scarce tissues that we currently use for allografts are at times in particularly short supply. Other factors, some of which are unpredictable, such as negative publicity and regulatory actions in the industry in which we operate (and which may not involve us) also could unexpectedly reduce the available supply of tissue. We rely on donor recovery groups for their human tissue supplies and we have relationships with tissue donor recovery groups across the country. We also have relationships outside the United States. Donor recovery groups are part of relatively complex relationships. They provide support to donor families, are regulated by the FDA and applicable foreign equivalents, and are often affiliated with hospitals, universities or organ procurement organizations. Our relationships with donor recovery groups, which are critical to our supply of tissue, could be affected by relationships recovery groups have with other organizations. Any negative impact arising from potential regulatory and disease transmission issues facing the industry, as well as the negative publicity that these issues could create, could adversely affect our ability to negotiate contracts with recovery groups. We cannot be sure that the supply of human tissue will continue to be available at current levels or will be sufficient to meet our needs. If we are not able to obtain tissue from current sources sufficient to meet our needs, we may not be able to locate additional replacement sources of tissue on commercially reasonable terms, if at all. Any interruption of our business caused by the need to locate additional sources of tissue could significantly impact our revenues. We expect that our revenues from allografts would decline in proportion to any decline in tissue supply. We depend on various third party suppliers and, in some cases, a single third party supplier for key raw materials and comp1nt parts, apart from human tissue, used in our tissue processing and manufacturing processes, and the loss of any of these third party suppliers, or their inability to supply us with adequate raw materials, could harm our business. We use a number of raw materials in addition to human tissue, including titanium, titanium alloys, stainless steel, PEEK, PEKK, and animal tissue. We rely from time to time on a number of suppliers and, in some cases, on a single source vendor. Our dependence on single third party suppliers, or even a limited number of third party suppliers in certain instances, creates several risks, including limited control over pricing, availability, quality and delivery schedules. In addition, any supply interruption or cancellation in a limited or sole sourced comp1nt or raw material could materially harm our ability to manufacture our products until a new source of supply, if any, could be found. We may be unable to find a sufficient alternative supply channel in a reasonable time period or on commercially reasonable terms, if at all, which would have an adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. In addition, a change in manufactures will require qualification of the new supplier to ensure they comply with or quality standards. Delays in qualifying a new supplier or re qualifying an existing supplier could have an adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Consolidation in the healthcare industry could lead to demands for price concessions or to the exclusion of some suppliers from certain of our markets, which could have an adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. Numerous initiatives and reforms initiated by legislators, regulators and third party payers to curb rising healthcare costs, in addition to other economic factors, have resulted in a consolidation trend in the healthcare industry to create new companies with greater market power, including hospitals. As the healthcare industry consolidates, competition to provide products and services to industry participants has become, and will likely continue to become, more intense. This in turn has resulted, and will likely continue to result in, greater pricing pressures and the exclusion of certain suppliers from various market segments as group purchasing organizations ( GPOs ), independent delivery ne2rks ( IDNs ), and large 12 Table of Contents single accounts continue to use their market power to consolidate purchasing decisions for some of our existing and prospective customers. We expect the market demand, government regulation, and third party reimbursement policies, among other potential factors, will continue to change the worldwide healthcare industry, resulting in further business consolidations and alliances among our customers and prospective customers, which may reduce competition among our existing and prospective customers, exert further downward pressure on the prices of our implants and may adversely impact our business, financial condition or results of operations. Our health insurance and prescription drug coverage, along with our self insurance reserves, may not cover future claims. For the health insurance year beginning January 1, 2016, we began to self insure for our U.S. employees medical and prescription drug insurance coverage. We are responsible for losses up to certain retention limits on both a per claim and aggregate basis. For policies under which we are responsible for losses, we record a liability that represents our estimated cost of claims incurred and unpaid as of the balance sheet date. Our estimated liability is not discounted and is based on a number of assumptions and factors, including historical trends and economic conditions, and is closely monitored and adjusted when warranted by changing circumstances. Fluctuating healthcare costs, severity of claims, increases in the employee population, and deviations from our expectations could affect the accuracy of estimates based on historical experience. If actual claims are greater in number and or severity compared to what was estimated or medical costs increase beyond what was expected, our accrued liabilities might not be sufficient and we may be required to record additional expense. Unanticipated changes may produce materially different amounts of expense than that reported under these programs, which could adversely impact our operating results. We operate in a highly regulated industry. An inability to meet current or future regulatory requirements in the U.S. or foreign jurisdictions, or any deficiencies with our manufacturing or quality systems and processes identified by regulatory agencies, could disrupt our business, subject us to regulatory action and costly litigation, damage our reputation for high quality production, cause a loss of confidence in the company and our implants and negatively impact our financial position and operating results. The FDA and several states have statutory authority to regulate allograft processing, including our BIOCLEANSE , TUTOPLAST and CANCELLE SP processes, and allograft based materials. We must register our facilities, whether located in the United States or elsewhere, with the FDA as well as regulators outside the U.S., and our implants must be made in a manner consistent with current good tissue practices ( cGTP ) or similar standards in each jurisdiction in which we manufacture. In addition, the FDA and other agencies perform periodic audits to ensure that our facilities remain in compliance with all appropriate regulations, including primarily the quality system regulations and medical device reporting regulations. Following an inspection, an agency may issue a notice listing conditions that are believed to violate cGTP or other regulations (such as a FDA report on Form 483, Notice of Observations), or a warning letter for violations of regulatory significance that may result in enforcement action if not promptly and adequately corrected. Since 2009, the FDA has significantly increased its oversight of companies subject to its regulations, including medical device companies, by hiring new investigators and stepping up inspections of manufacturing facilities. In recent years, the FDA has also significantly increased the number of warning and untitled letters issued to companies. If the FDA were to conclude that we are not in compliance with applicable laws or regulations, or that any of our implants are ineffective or pose an unreasonable health risk, the FDA could ban such implants, detain or seize adulterated or misbranded implants, order a recall, repair, replacement, or refund of such implants, refuse to grant pending premarket approval applications or require certificates of foreign governments for exports and or require us to notify health professionals and others that the implants present unreasonable risks of substantial harm to the public health. The FDA may also impose operating restrictions, enjoin and restrain certain violations of applicable law pertaining to medical devices and assess civil or criminal penalties against our officers, employees or us. The FDA may also recommend prosecution to the Department of Justice. Any adverse regulatory action, depending on its magnitude, may restrict us from effectively marketing and selling our implants. Any inability to meet current or future regulatory requirements in the United States or foreign jurisdictions, or any deficiencies with our manufacturing or quality systems and processes identified by regulatory agencies would likely disrupt our business, subject us to regulatory action and costly litigation, damage our reputation for high quality production, cause a loss of confidence in the company and our implants and negatively impact our financial position and operating results. If any of our allografts fall under the FDA definitions of more than minimally manipulated or indicated for non 13 Table of Contents homologous use, we would be required to obtain medical device approval or clearance or biologics licenses, which could require clinical testing and could result in disapproval of our license applications and restricted distribution of any of our allografts which may become subject to pre market approval. The FDA could require post market testing and surveillance to monitor the effects of such allografts, could restrict the commercial applications of these allografts, and could conduct periodic inspections of our facilities and our suppliers. Delays encountered during the FDA approval process could shorten the patent protection period during which we have the exclusive right to commercialize such technologies or could allow others to come to market before us with similar technologies. For example, on November 9, 2017, the FDA issued a Warning Letter to us related to our map3 allograft. The letter reiterated the FDA previously expressed belief that the processing of map3 allograft rendered it more than minimally manipulated and therefore subject to the requirements of a biologics license application and associated manufacturing requirements under GMP regulations, 21 CFR Part 211 There was no requirement to cease production or to recall distributed map3 allografts from the market. Although we worked diligently and collaboratively with the FDA to resolve any concerns regarding the map3 allografts, including providing comprehensive packages of data to address the FDA comments and we believe that in both developing and processing of map3 we properly considered the relevant regulatory requirements, we decided during the third quarter of 2018 to stop procurement, manufacturing and distributing the map3 implants effective October 31, 2018. The map3 product is now off the market. cGTP covers all stages of allograft processing, from procurement of tissue to distribution of final allografts. In addition, these regulations have a significant effect upon recovery agencies which supply us with tissue and have increased the cost of recovery activities. These increases have translated into increased costs for us, because we are expected to reimburse the recovery agencies based on their cost of recovery. In addition to the FDA, several state agencies regulate tissue banking. Regulations issued by Florida, New York, California and Maryland are particularly relevant to our business. Most states do not currently have tissue banking regulations, but it is possible that others may make allegations against us or against donor recovery groups or tissue banks, including those with which we have relationships, about non compliance with applicable FDA regulations or other relevant statutes and regulations. Allegations like these could cause regulators or other authorities to take investigative or other action, or could cause negative publicity for our business and the industry in which we operate. Most of our metal, synthetic, and xenograft products, and a few allograft products, fall into an FDA classification that requires the submission of a Premarket Notification (510(k)) to the FDA. This process requires us to demonstrate that the device to be marketed is at least as safe and effective as, that is, substantially equivalent to, a legally marketed device. We must submit information that supports our substantial equivalency claims. Before we can market the new device, we must receive an order from the FDA finding substantial equivalence and clearing the new device for commercial distribution in the U.S. We are also subject to periodic inspection by the FDA for compliance with its Quality System Regulation (21 CFR Part 820) ( QSR ), among other FDA requirements, such as restrictions on advertising and promotion. Our manufacturing operations, and those of our third party manufacturers, are required to comply with the QSR, which addresses a company responsibility for product design, testing and manufacturing quality assurance and the maintenance of records and documentation. The QSR requires that each manufacturer establish a quality system by which the manufacturer monitors the manufacturing process and maintains records that show compliance with FDA regulations and the manufacturer written specifications and procedures relating to the devices. QSR compliance is necessary to receive and maintain FDA clearance or approval to market new and existing products. The FDA makes announced and unannounced periodic and on going inspections of medical device manufacturers to determine compliance with the QSR. If in connection with these inspections the FDA believes the manufacturer has failed to comply with applicable regulations and or procedures, it may issue inspectional observations on Form 483 that would necessitate prompt corrective action. If FDA inspectional observations are not addressed and or corrective action is not taken in a timely manner and to the FDA satisfaction, the FDA may issue a warning letter (which would similarly necessitate prompt corrective action) and or proceed directly to other forms of enforcement action, including the imposition of operating restrictions, including a ceasing of operations, on 1 or more facilities, enjoining and restraining certain violations of applicable law pertaining to medical devices and assessing civil or criminal penalties against our officers, employees or us. The FDA could also issue a warning letter or a consent decree. The FDA may also recommend prosecution to the U.S. Department of Justice ( DOJ ). Any adverse regulatory action, depending on its magnitude, may restrict us from effectively manufacturing, marketing and selling our products and could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. For information regarding certain warning letters and FDA Form 483 inspectional observations that we are addressing, see Note 22 to the consolidated financial statements. The FDA, in cooperation with U.S. Customs and Border Protection ( CBP ), administers controls over the import 14 Table of Contents of medical devices into the U.S. The CBP imposes its own regulatory requirements on the import of our products, including inspection and possible sanctions for noncompliance. We are also subject to foreign trade controls administered by certain U.S. government agencies, including the Bureau of Industry and Security within the Commerce Department and the Office of Foreign Assets Control within the Treasury Department ( OFAC ). There are also requirements of state, local and foreign governments that we must comply with in the manufacture and marketing of our products. In many of the foreign countries in which we market our products, we are subject to local regulations affecting, among other things, design and product standards, packaging requirements and labeling requirements. Many of the regulations applicable to our devices and products in these countries are similar to those of the FDA. The member countries of the European Union have adopted the European Medical Device Directive, which creates a single set of medical device regulations for products marketed in all member countries. Compliance with the Medical Device Directive and certification to a quality system (e.g., ISO 13485 certification) enable the manufacturer to place a CE mark on its products. To obtain authorization to affix the CE mark to a product, a recognized European Notified Body must assess a manufacturer quality system and the product conformity to the requirements of the Medical Device Directive. We are subject to inspection by the Notified Bodies for compliance with these requirements. In addition, many countries, such as Germany, have very specific additional regulatory requirements for quality assurance and manufacturing with which we must comply. Effective May 26, 2020, the European Union new MDR will replace the current medical device directives. All medical devices currently distributed in the European Union under the medical device directives are likely impacted. The MDR may also include products, such as human tissue, not traditionally considered medical devices in the European Union. Additionally, the MDR, among other things, increases regulatory requirements for several medical device groupings applicable to the Company implants distributed in the European Union, including strengthening notified body oversight for Class I reusable surgical instruments, and up classifying spinal devices in contact with the spinal column. Additional pre clinical testing or clinical studies may be required to meet new MDR requirements. As notified bodies are preparing for certification under the MDR, a trend has been observed among industry participants that the notified bodies are becoming more rigorous and conservative in their interpretation and application of currently existing directives, resulting in observations requiring corrective actions, particularly with respect to clinical evaluation reports (CERs), that cause industry members, including the Company, to incur additional costs. Further, with the implementation of the MDR the demand for notified body services is anticipated to increase while the number of eligible entities qualified as notified bodies is anticipated to decrease, thereby creating for the foreseeable future an imbalance in supply and demand that is anticipated to increase the cost of notified body services. Meeting the requirements of the MDR will likely cause us to incur additional costs and or require us to discontinue distributing certain products in the European Union and other countries outside the European Union that rely on the CE mark for distribution into such countries. If we are unable to timely meet the requirements of the new MDR we may be prohibited from distributing our affected products in the European Union and other countries that rely on the CE mark, which could cause us to lose revenue. Further, notified bodies are subject to new certification. If the Company notified body is not re certified, or if they are certified for a narrower range of product types, the Company may have to engage a new or additional notified body which could cause a delay in meeting the new MDR requirements. Individually or cumulatively, these changes associated with the MDR could cause us to incur costs or require us to change our business practices in a manner adverse to our business. Our business is subject to complex and evolving U.S. and international laws and regulation regarding privacy and data protection. Many of these laws and regulations are subject to change and uncertain interpretation and could result in claims, changes to our business practices, penalties, increased cost of operations, or declines in user growth or engagement, or otherwise harm our business. Regulatory authorities around the world are considering a number of legislative and regulatory proposals concerning data protection. The interpretation and application of consumer and data protection laws in the U.S., European Union and elsewhere are often uncertain and subject to change. It is possible that these laws may be interpreted and applied in a manner that is inconsistent with our data practices. These legislative and regulatory proposals, if adopted, and such interpretations could, in addition to the possibility of fines, result in an order requiring that we change our data practices, which could have an adverse effect on our business and results of operations. Complying with these various laws could cause us to incur substantial costs or require us to change our business practices in a manner adverse to our business. Recent legal developments in Europe have created compliance uncertainty regarding certain transfers of personal data from Europe to the United States. For example, the General Data Protection Regulation ( GDPR ), which became effective in the European Union on May 25, 2018, applies to our activities conducted from an establishment in the European Union or related to products and services that we offer to European Union customers. The GDPR will create a range of new compliance obligations, which could cause us to change our business practices, and will significantly increase financial penalties for noncompliance. 15 Table of Contents In addition, the European Commission in July 2016 and the Swiss Government in January 2017 approved the EU U.S. and the Swiss U.S. Privacy Shield frameworks, respectively, which are designed to allow U.S. companies that self certify to the U.S. Department of Commerce and publicly commit to comply with the Privacy Shield requirements to freely import personal data from the European Union and Switzerland. However, these frameworks face a number of legal challenges and their validity remains subject to legal, regulatory and political developments in both the European Union and the U.S. This has resulted in some uncertainty, and compliance obligations could cause us to incur costs or require us to change our business practices in a manner adverse to our business. Our administrative headquarters and a majority of all of our allograft processing facilities are currently conducted in locations that may be at risk of damage from hurricanes, fire, or other natural disasters. If a natural disaster strikes our administrative headquarters or any of our other processing or manufacturing facilities, our operations may be interrupted and we may be unable to process or manufacture certain products for a substantial amount of time. Our administrative headquarters and a majority of all of our allograft processing facilities are located in Alachua, Florida, in an area with historical occurrences of hurricane damage and wild fires. We have taken precautions to safeguard our facilities, including obtaining property, casualty and business interruption insurance. We have also developed an information technology disaster recovery plan. However, any future natural disaster at this or our other locations could cause substantial delays in our operations, damage or destroy our facilities, equipment or inventory, and cause us to incur additional expenses. A disaster could seriously harm our business, financial condition and results of operations. Our facilities would be difficult to replace and would require substantial lead time to repair or replace. The insurance we maintain may not be adequate to cover our losses in any particular case and may not continue to be available to us on acceptable terms, or at all. If we fail to maintain existing strategic relationships or are unable to identify distributors of our implants, revenues may decrease. We currently derive a significant amount of our revenues through distributors such as Zimmer, Medtronic and Synthes. In addition, our spine distributors provide nearly all of the instrumentation, surgeon training, distribution assistance and marketing materials for the lines of spinal implants that we produce and they distribute. Variations in the timing and volume of orders by our distributors, particularly those who distribute a significant amount of our implants, may have a material effect upon our revenues. If our relationships with our distributors are terminated or reduced for any reason and we are unable to replace these relationships with other means of distribution, we could suffer a material decrease in revenues. We may need, or decide it is otherwise advantageous to us, to obtain the assistance of additional distributors to market and distribute our new implants and technologies, as well as to market and distribute our existing implants and technologies, to new markets or geographical areas. We may not be able to find additional distributors who will agree to and are able to successfully market and distribute our implants and technologies on commercially reasonable terms, if at all. If we are unable to establish additional distribution relationships on favorable terms, our revenues may decline. Also, our financial results are dependent upon the service efforts of our distributors. If our distributors are unsuccessful in adequately servicing our products, our sales could significantly decrease. If third party payers fail to provide appropriate levels of reimbursement for the use of our implants, revenues could be adversely affected. The impact of United States healthcare reform legislation on our business remains uncertain. In 2010 federal legislation to reform the United States healthcare system was enacted into law. The impact of this far reaching legislation, including Medicare provisions purportedly aimed at improving quality and decreasing costs, comparative effectiveness research, an independent payment advisory board, and pilot programs to evaluate alternative payment methodologies, could meaningfully change the way healthcare is designed and delivered. It is possible that aspects of currently enacted legislation may change or be struck down by the courts. The extent of any such changes and the impact on our business is uncertain. We therefore cannot predict what other healthcare programs and regulations will be ultimately implemented at the federal or state level, or the effect of any future legislation, court rulings or regulation in the United States. Amendments to, or rescissions of, existing laws and regulations, or the implementation of new 1s, could meaningfully change the way healthcare is designed and delivered. Any change that lowers reimbursement for an implant, our services, or our other technologies, or that reduces medical procedure volumes, would likely adversely impact our business and 16 Table of Contents results of operations. If we fail to maintain the high processing standards that implants require or if we are unable to develop processing capacity as required, our commercial opportunity will be reduced or eliminated. Implants require careful calibration and precise, high quality processing and or manufacturing. Achieving precision and quality control requires skill and diligence by our personnel. If we fail to achieve and maintain these high standards, including avoiding processing and manufacturing errors, and, depending on the nature of the complaint, design defects or comp1nt failures; we could be forced to recall, withdraw or suspend distribution of our implants; our implants and technologies could fail quality assurance and performance tests; production and deliveries of our implants could be delayed or cancelled and our processing and or manufacturing costs could increase. Further, to be successful, we will need to manage our human tissue processing capacity related to tissue recovery and demand for our allografts. It may be difficult for us to match our processing capacity to demand due to problems related to the amount of suitable tissue, quality control and assurance, tissue availability, adequacy of control policies and procedures and lack of skilled personnel. If we are unable to process and produce our implants on a timely basis, at acceptable quality and costs, and in sufficient quantities, or if we experience unanticipated technological problems or delays in processing, it may reduce revenues, increase our cost per allograft processed or both. The allograft industry is subject to additional local, state, federal and international government regulations and any increased regulations of our activities could significantly increase the cost of doing business, thereby reducing profitability. Some aspects of our business are subject to additional local, state, federal or international regulation. Changes in the laws or new interpretations of existing laws could negatively affect our business, revenues or prospects, and increase the costs associated with conducting our business. In particular, the procurement and transplantation of allograft tissue is subject to federal regulation under the National Organ Transplant Act ( NOTA ), a criminal statute that prohibits the purchase and sale of human organs, including b1 and other tissue. NOTA permits the payment of reasonable fees associated with the transportation, processing, preservation, quality control and storage of human tissue. If NOTA were amended or interpreted in a way that made us unable to include some of these costs in the amounts we charge our customers, it could reduce our revenues and therefore negatively impact our business. It is possible that more restrictive interpretations or expansions of NOTA could be adopted which could require us to change 1 or more aspects of our business, at a substantial cost, in order to continue to comply with this statute. A variety of additional local, state, federal and international government laws and regulations govern our business, including those relating to the storage, handling, generation, manufacture and disposal of medical wastes from the processing of tissue and collaborations with health care professionals. If we fail to conduct our business in compliance with these laws and regulations, we could be subject to significant liabilities for which our insurance may not be adequate. Moreover, such insurance may not always be available in the future on commercially reasonable terms, if at all. If our insurance proves to be inadequate to pay a damage award, we may not have sufficient funds to do so, which would harm our financial condition and liquidity. Our success depends on the continued acceptance of our surgical implants and technologies by the medical community. New allograft, xenograft, metal or synthetic implants, technologies or enhancements to our existing implants may never achieve broad market acceptance, which can be affected by numerous factors, including lack of clinical acceptance of implants and technologies; introduction of competitive treatment options which render implants and technologies too expensive or obsolete; lack of availability of third party reimbursement; and difficulty training surgeons in the use of tissue implants and technologies. Market acceptance will also depend on our ability to demonstrate that our existing and new implants and technologies are an attractive alternative to existing treatment options. Our ability to do so will depend on surgeons evaluations of the clinical safety, efficacy, ease of use, reliability and cost effectiveness of these treatment options and technologies. For example, we believe that some in the medical community have lingering concerns over the risk of disease transmission through the use of allografts. Furthermore, we believe that even if the medical community generally accepts our implants and technologies, acceptance and recommendations by influential surgeons will be important to the broad commercial success of our implants 17 Table of Contents and technologies. If our implants and technologies are not broadly accepted in the marketplace, we may not remain competitive in the market. Rapid technological changes could result in reduced demand for our implants and products. Technologies change rapidly in the industry in which we operate. For example, steady improvements have been made in synthetic human tissue substitutes which compete with our tissue implants. Unlike allografts, synthetic tissue technologies are not dependent on the availability of tissue. If 1 of our competitors successfully introduces synthetic technologies using recombinant technologies, which stimulate the growth of tissue surrounding an implant, it could result in a decline in demand for tissue implants. We may not be able to respond effectively to technological changes and emerging industry standards, or to successfully identify, develop or support new technologies or enhancements to existing implants in a timely and cost effective manner, if at all. If we are unable to achieve the improvements in our implants necessary for their successful commercialization, the demand for our implants will suffer. We face intense competition, which could result in reduced acceptance and demand for our implants and technologies. The medical technology biotechnology industry is intensely competitive. We compete with companies in the United States and internationally that engage in the development and production of medical technologies and processes including biotechnology, orthopedic, pharmaceutical, biomaterial and other companies; academic and scientific institutions; and public and private research organizations. Many of our competitors have much greater financial, technical, research, marketing, distribution, service and other resources than we do. Moreover, our competitors may offer a broader array of tissue repair treatment products, medical devices, surgical instruments and technologies or may have greater name recognition in the marketplace. We compete with a number of companies with significantly greater resources and brand recognition than ours. Our competitors, including several development stage companies, may develop or market technologies that are more effective or commercially attractive than our technologies, or that may render our technologies obsolete. For example, the development of a synthetic tissue implant that permits remodeling of b1s could reduce the demand for allograft and xenograft based implants and technologies. If we do not manage the medical release of donor tissue into processing in an effective and efficient manner, it could adversely affect profitability. Many factors affect the level and timing of donor medical releases, including the effectiveness of donor screening performed by donor recovery groups, the timely receipt, recording and review of required medical documentation, and employee loss and turnover in our medical records department. We can provide no assurance that releases will occur at levels which maximize our processing efficiency and minimize our cost per allograft processed. Negative publicity concerning methods of human tissue recovery and screening of donor tissue in the industry in which we operate may reduce demand for our allografts and impact the supply of available donor tissue. Media reports or other negative publicity concerning both methods of tissue recovery from donors and actual or potential disease transmission from donated tissue may limit widespread acceptance of our allografts, whether directed to allografts generally or our allografts specifically. Unfavorable reports of improper or illegal tissue recovery practices by any participant in the industry, both in the United States and internationally, as well as incidents of improperly processed tissue leading to transmission of disease, may broadly affect the rate of future tissue donation and market acceptance of allograft technologies. Potential patients may not be able to distinguish our allografts, technologies and the tissue recovery and the processing procedures from those of our competitors or others engaged in tissue recovery. In addition, families of potential donors may become reluctant to agree to donate tissue to for profit tissue processors. If our patents and the other means we use to protect our intellectual property prove to be inadequate, our competitors could exploit our intellectual property to compete more effectively against us. The law of patents and trade secrets is constantly evolving and often involves complex legal and factual questions. The U.S. government may deny or significantly reduce the coverage we seek for our patent applications before or after a patent is issued. We cannot be sure that any particular patent for which we apply will be issued, that the scope of the patent 18 Table of Contents protection will be comprehensive enough to provide adequate protection from competing technologies, that interference, derivation, reexamination, post grant review or inter parties review proceedings regarding any of our patent applications will not be filed, or that we will achieve any other competitive advantage from a patent. In addition, it is possible that 1 or more of our patents will be held invalid or reduced in scope of claims if challenged or that others will claim rights in or ownership of our patents and other proprietary rights. If any of these events occur, our competitors may be able to use our intellectual property to compete more effectively against us. Because patent applications remain secret until published (typically 18 months after first filing) and the publication of discoveries in the scientific or patent literature often lag behind actual discoveries, we cannot be certain that our patent application was the first application filed disclosing or potentially covering a particular invention. If another party rights to an invention are superior to ours, we may not be able to obtain a license to use that party invention on commercially reasonable terms, if at all. In addition, our competitors, many of which have greater resources than ours, could obtain patents that will prevent, limit or interfere with our ability to make use of our inventions either in the United States or in international markets. Further, the laws of some foreign countries do not always protect our intellectual property rights to the same extent as the laws of the United States. Litigation or regulatory proceedings in the United States or foreign countries also may be necessary to enforce our patent or other intellectual property rights or to determine the scope and validity of the proprietary rights of our competitors. These proceedings may prove unsuccessful and may also be costly, result in development delays, and divert the attention of our management. We rely upon unpatented proprietary techniques and processes in tissue recovery, research and development, tissue processing, manufacturing and quality assurance. It is possible that others will independently develop technology similar to our technology or otherwise gain access to or disclose our proprietary technologies. We may not be able to meaningfully protect our rights in these proprietary technologies, which would reduce our ability to compete. Our success depends in part on our ability to operate without infringing on or misappropriating the proprietary rights of others, and if we are unable to do so we may be liable for damages. We cannot be certain that U.S. or foreign patents or patent applications of other companies do not exist or will not be issued that would prevent us from commercializing our allografts, xenografts, medical devices, surgical instruments and other technologies. Third parties may sue us for infringing or misappropriating their patent or other intellectual property rights. Intellectual property litigation is costly. If we do not prevail in litigation, in addition to any damages we might have to pay, we could be required to cease the infringing activity or obtain a license requiring us to make royalty payments. It is possible that a required license may not be available to us on commercially acceptable terms, if at all. In addition, a required license may be non exclusive, and therefore our competitors may have access to the same technology licensed to us. If we fail to obtain a required license or are unable to design around another company patent, we may be unable to make use of some of the affected technologies or distribute the affected allografts, xenografts or surgical implants, which would reduce our revenues. The defense costs and settlements for patent infringement lawsuits are not covered by insurance. Patent infringement lawsuits can take years to settle. If we are not successful in our defenses or are not successful in obtaining dismissals of any such lawsuit, legal fees or settlement costs could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations and financial position. We or our competitors may be exposed to product or professional liability claims which could cause us to be liable for damages or cause investors to think we will be liable for similar claims in the future. The development, manufacture, and distribution of implants, medical devices, surgical instruments, and other technologies for surgical and medical treatment entails an inherent risk of product or professional liability claims, and substantial product or professional liability claims may be asserted against us. We are party to a number of legal proceedings relating to professional liability. The prevailing view among the states throughout the United States is that providing allografts is a service and not the sale of a product. As such, allografts are not typically subject to product liability causes of action. However, the law of a particular state could change in response to legislative changes or by judicial interpretation in a state where such issue has either not been previously addressed or prior precedent is overturned or subject to different interpretations by a court of higher precedential authority. In addition, due to the international scope of our activities we are subject to the laws of foreign jurisdictions which may treat allografts as products in those jurisdictions. The implantation of donated human tissue implants creates the potential for transmission of communicable diseases. Although we comply with federal, state and foreign regulations and guidelines intended to prevent communicable 19 Table of Contents disease transmission, and our tissue suppliers are also required to comply with such regulations, there can be no assurances that (i) our tissue suppliers will comply with such regulations intended to prevent communicable disease transmissions; (ii) even if such compliance is achieved, that our implants have not been or will not be associated with transmission of disease; or (iii) a patient otherwise infected with disease would not err1ously assert a claim that the use of our implants resulted in disease transmission. Our business of designing, manufacturing and marketing metal, synthetic, and xenograft medical devices and surgical instruments exposes us to potential product liability risks that are inherent in such activities. In the ordinary course of business, we are the subject of product liability lawsuits alleging that comp1nt failures, manufacturing flaws, design defects or inadequate disclosure of product related risks or product related information resulted in an unsafe condition or injury to patients. We currently have $30 million of product and professional liability insurance to cover claims. This amount of insurance may not be adequate for potential claims if we are not successful in our defenses. Moreover, insurance covering our business may not always be available in the future on commercially reasonable terms, if at all. If our insurance proves to be inadequate to pay a damage award, we may not have sufficient funds to do so, which would harm our financial condition and liquidity. In addition, successful product liability claims made against 1 of our competitors could cause claims to be made against us or expose us to a perception that we are vulnerable to similar claims. Claims against us, regardless of their merit or potential outcome, may also hurt our ability to obtain surgeon acceptance of our implants or to expand our business. We are subject to federal, state and foreign laws and regulations, including fraud and abuse laws, as well as anti bribery laws, and could face substantial penalties if we fail to fully comply with such regulations and laws. Our relationship with foreign and domestic government entities and healthcare professionals, such as physicians, hospitals and those to whom and through whom we may market our implants and technologies, are subject to scrutiny under various federal, state and territorial laws in the United States and other jurisdictions in which we conduct business. These include, for example, anti kickback laws, physician self referral laws, false claims laws, criminal health care fraud laws, and anti bribery laws (e.g., the United States Foreign Corrupt Practices Act). Violations of these laws are punishable by criminal and or civil sanctions, including, in some instances, fines, imprisonment and, within the United States, exclusion from participation in government healthcare programs, including Medicare, Medicaid and Veterans Administration health programs. These laws are administered by, among others, the U.S. Department of Justice, the Office of Inspector General of the Department of Health and Human Services, state attorneys general, and their respective counterparts in the applicable foreign jurisdictions in which we conduct business. Many of these agencies have increased their enforcement activities with respect to medical device manufacturers in recent years. If we are not successful in expanding our distribution activities into international markets, we will not be able to pursue 1 of our strategies for increasing revenues. Our international distribution strategies vary by market, as well as within each country in which we operate. For example, we distribute only a portion of our line of allograft and xenograft implants within each foreign country where we operate. Our international operations will be subject to a number of risks which may vary from the risks we face in the United States, including the need to obtain regulatory approvals in additional foreign countries before we can offer our implants and technologies for use; the potential burdens of complying with a variety of foreign laws; longer distribution to collection cycles, as well as difficulty in collecting accounts receivable; dependence on local distributors; limited protection of intellectual property rights; fluctuations in the values of foreign currencies; and political and economic instability. Security breaches, loss of data and other disruptions could compromise sensitive information related to our business, prevent us from accessing critical information or expose us to liability, which could adversely affect our business and our reputation. In the ordinary course of our business, we collect and store sensitive data, including patient health information, personally identifiable information about our employees, intellectual property, and proprietary business information. We manage and maintain our applications and data utilizing on site and off site systems. These applications and data encompass a wide variety of business critical information including research and development information, commercial information and business and financial information. The secure processing, storage, maintenance and transmission of this critical information is vital to our operations and business strategy, and we devote significant resources to protecting such information. Although we take measures to 20 Table of Contents protect sensitive information from unauthorized access or disclosure, our information technology and infrastructure may be vulnerable to attacks by hackers, viruses, breaches or interruptions due to employee error or malfeasance, terrorist attacks, hurricanes, fire, flood, other natural disasters, power loss, computer systems failure, data ne2rk failure, internet failure, or lapses in compliance with privacy and security mandates. Any such virus, breach or interruption could compromise our ne2rks and the information stored there could be accessed by unauthorized parties, publicly disclosed, lost or stolen. We have measures in place that are designed to detect and respond to such security incidents and breaches of privacy and security mandates. Any such access, disclosure or other loss of information could result in legal claims or proceedings, liability under laws that protect the privacy of personal information, government enforcement actions and regulatory penalties. Unauthorized access, loss or dissemination could also interrupt our operations, including our ability to receive and ship orders from customers, bill our customers, provide customer support services, conduct research and development activities, process and prepare company financial information, manage various general and administrative aspects of our business and damage our reputation, any of which could adversely affect our business. The outcome of litigation or arbitration in which we are involved is unpredictable and an adverse decision in any such matter could adversely impact our business, financial condition or results of operations. In addition to product and professional liability legal proceedings and claims, we are from time to time subject to intellectual property and various commercial legal proceedings and claims that arise in the ordinary course of business. Given the uncertain nature of legal proceedings generally, we are not able in all cases to estimate the amount or range of loss that could result from an unfavorable outcome. We could in the future incur judgments or enter into settlements of claims that could adversely impact our business, financial condition or results of operations. We may be subject to suit under a state or federal whistleblower statute. Those who engage in business with the federal government, directly or indirectly, may be sued under a federal whistleblower statute designed to combat fraud and abuse in the healthcare industry. These lawsuits, known as qui tam suits, are authorized under certain circumstances by the False Claims Act and can involve significant m1tary damages and award bounties to private plaintiffs who successfully bring these suits. If any of these lawsuits were to be brought against us, such suits combined with increased operating costs and substantial uninsured liabilities could have a material adverse effect on our financial condition and operations. The Affordable Care Act has sought to link the violations of the Anti Kickback Statute with violations of the False Claims Act, making it arguably easier for the government or for whistleblowers, acting in the name of the government, to sue medical manufactures under the False Claims Act. In addition to federal whistleblower laws, various states in which we operate also have separate whistleblower laws to which we may be subject. Our business could be negatively affected as a result of actions of activist stockholders, and such activism could impact the trading value of our securities. Responding to actions by activist stockholders can be costly and time consuming, disrupting our operations and diverting the attention of management and our employees. Such activities could interfere with our ability to execute our strategic plan. In addition, a proxy contest for the election of directors at our annual meeting would likely require us to incur significant legal fees and proxy solicitation expenses and require significant time and attention by management and our board of directors. The perceived uncertainties as to our future direction also could affect the market price and volatility of our securities. The tax treatment of corporations could be subject to potential legislative, administrative or judicial changes or interpretations. The present federal income tax treatment of corporations may be modified by legislative, administrative or judicial changes or interpretations at any time. For example, on December 22, 2017, the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (the Tax Legislation ) was enacted. The Tax Legislation significantly revises the U.S. corporate income tax code. We are unable to predict whether future modifications will be made to the U.S. corporate income tax code. Any such future changes could materially adversely affect us. 21 Table of Contents We are dependent on our key management and technical personnel for continued success. Our senior management team is concentrated in a small number of key members, and our future success depends to a meaningful extent on the services of our executive officers and other key team members, including members of our scientific staff. Generally, our executive officers and employees can terminate their employment relationship at any time. The loss of any key employees or our inability to attract or retain other qualified personnel could materially harm our business and prospects. Effective succession planning is important to our long term success. We are in the process of reorganizing our business, as part of our ongoing business transformation, which has resulted in a number of leadership changes. Disruptions in the transition or reorganization could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations, and financial condition and could adversely affect our ability to attract and retain other key executives. Competition for qualified leadership and scientific personnel in our industry is intense, and we compete for leadership and scientific personnel with other companies that have greater financial and other resources than we do. Our future success will depend in large part on our ability to attract, retain, and motivate highly qualified leadership and scientific personnel, and there can be no assurance that we are able to do so. Any difficulty in hiring or retaining needed personnel, or increased costs related thereto, could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations, and financial condition. Water Street may exercise significant influence over us, including through its ability to elect up to 2 members of our Board of Directors. We issued 50,000 shares of Series A convertible preferred stock ( Preferred Stock ) to WSHP Biologics Holdings, LLC, an affiliate of Water Street Healthcare Partners, a leading healthcare focused private equity firm ( Water Street ), in connection with the closing of the Pi1er acquisition. As holders of this Preferred Stock, Water Street is entitled to vote on an as converted basis, up to a maximum number of as converted shares, upon all matters upon which holders of our common stock have the right to vote. The shares of Preferred Stock owned by Water Street currently represent approximately 16% of the voting rights in respect of our share capital on an as converted basis; accordingly, Water Street has the ability to significantly influence the outcome of any matter submitted for the vote of our stockholders (also, Water Street is not prohibited from buying shares of our common stock). In addition, the dividends which have accrued on each outstanding share of Preferred Stock are added to the liquidation value with respect to such share of Preferred Stock. On August 1, 2018, we amended and restated the Certificate of Designation of Series A Convertible Preferred Stock. Pursuant to the Amended and Restated Certificate of Designation of Series A Convertible Preferred Stock, dividends on our Series A Preferred Stock ceased accruing as of July 16, 2018. We did not pay dividends on the Preferred Stock from the fourth quarter of 2013 through June 16, 2018. Consequently, we have accrued $16.5 million in preferred dividends payable as of December 31, 2018. Water Street may have interests that diverge from, or even conflict with, those of our other stockholders. In addition, our Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation and Investor Rights Agreement with Water Street provide that Water Street consent is required before we may take certain actions for so long as Water Street and its permitted transferees beneficially own in the aggregate at least 10% of our issued share capital. In addition, our Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation and our Investor Rights Agreement with Water Street provide that Water Street has the right to designate and nominate, respectively, directors to our Board of Directors such that the percentage of our board members so designated or nominated is approximately equal to Water Street percentage equity ownership interest in the company. The maximum number of directors that Water Street is able to designate or nominate is 2, with at least 1 of such directors to serve on each of our Board committees. If Water Street ownership of our share capital on an as converted basis falls below 5% (calculated on a fully diluted basis, assuming conversion of the Preferred Stock at the then existing conversion price), Water Street would have no further director designation or nomination rights under our Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation or the investor rights agreement. In addition, the ownership position and the governance rights of Water Street could discourage a third party from proposing a change of control or other strategic transaction with us. Our ability to pay dividends and to make distributions may be limited or prohibited by the terms of our 22 Table of Contents indebtedness or Preferred Stock. We are, and may in the future become, party to agreements and instruments that restrict or prevent the payment of dividends on our capital stock. In June 2018, we entered into a Credit Agreement dated as of June 5, 2018 (the 2018 Credit Agreement ), among us, as a borrower, Pi1er, our wholly owned subsidiary, as a borrower, the other loan parties thereto as guarantors, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. ( JPM ), as lender (together with the various financial institutions as in the future may become parties thereto, the 2018 Lenders ) and as administrative agent for the 2018 Lenders. Under the terms of the 2018 Credit Agreement, we are restricted from paying dividends on our common stock without the prior written consent of the administrative agent. We are also restricted from paying dividends or making distributions on our common stock without the prior written consent of the holders of a majority of the Preferred Stock pursuant to the terms of the Amended and Restated Certificate of Designation of Series A Convertible Preferred Stock, so long as any shares of the Preferred Stock remain outstanding. In addition, under the terms of the 2018 Credit Agreement, distributions to holders of our Preferred Stock are permitted only to the extent that we can satisfy certain financial covenant tests (based on the ratio of our total indebtedness to consolidated EBITDA) and meet other requirements. The 2018 Credit Agreement contains financial and operating restrictions that may limit our access to credit. If we fail to comply with financial or other covenants in the 2018 Credit Agreement, we may be required to repay indebtedness to our existing lenders, which may harm our liquidity. Provisions in the 2018 Credit Agreement impose restrictions on our ability to, among other things merge or consolidate; make strategic acquisitions; make dispositions of property; create liens; enter into transactions with affiliates; become a guarantor; pay dividends and make distributions; incur more debt; and make investments. The 2018 Credit Agreement also contains financial covenants that require us to maintain compliance with specified financial ratios and maintain a specified amount of cash on hand. We may not be able to comply with the financial covenants in the future. In the absence of a waiver from our lenders, any failure by us to comply with these covenants in the future may result in the declaration of an event of default, which could prevent us from borrowing under the 2018 Credit Agreement. In addition to preventing additional borrowings under the 2018 Credit Agreement, an event of default, if not cured or waived, may result in the acceleration of the maturity of indebtedness outstanding, if any, under the agreement, which would require us to pay all amounts outstanding. If an event of default occurs, we may not be able to cure it within any applicable cure period, if at all. If the maturity of our indebtedness is accelerated, we then may not have sufficient funds available for repayment or the ability to borrow or obtain sufficient funds to replace the accelerated indebtedness on terms acceptable to us, or at all. We have incurred a significant amount of secured debt, and expect to incur a significant amount of additional debt in the future. The 2018 Credit Agreement provides for a revolving credit facility in the aggregate principal amount of up to $100 million (the 2018 Facility ). We and Pi1er will be able to, at our option, and subject to customary conditions and 2018 Lender approval, request an increase to the 2018 Facility by up to $50 million. A total of $50 million currently is outstanding on the 2018 Facility due to the Company pay off of the 2017 Loan Agreement. The 2018 Facility is guaranteed by our domestic subsidiaries and is secured by (i) substantially all of our assets and the assets of Pi1er; (ii) substantially all of the assets of each of our domestic subsidiaries; and (iii) 65% of the stock of our foreign subsidiaries. Borrowings made under the 2018 Credit Agreement will bear interest at a rate per annum equal to the monthly REVLIBOR30 Rate ( CBFR Loans ) plus an adjustable margin of up to 200% (the CBFR Rate ). We may elect to convert the interest rate for the initial borrowings to a rate per annum equal to the adjusted LIBO Rate ( Eurodollar Loans ) plus an adjustable margin of up to 200% (the Eurodollar Rate ). For all subsequent borrowings, we may elect to apply either the CBFR Rate or Eurodollar Rate. The applicable margin is subject to adjustment after the end of each fiscal quarter, based upon our average quarterly availability. The maturity date of the 2018 Facility is June 5, 2023 23 Table of Contents The Company may make optional prepayments on the 2018 Facility without penalty. In November 2018, in connection with our entry into the Master Transaction Agreement, we entered into (i) a Consent Under Credit Agreement with JPM (the First Lien Consent ) pursuant to which JPM agreed to amend the 2018 Credit Agreement to, among other things, (a) reduce the aggregate revolving credit commitments under the 2018 Credit Agreement from $100 million to $75 million (the Amended 2018 Credit Agreement ) and (b) consent to the incurrence of the Second Lien Facility (as defined below) and (ii) a Commitment Letter ( Second Lien Commitment Letter ) with Ares Capital Corporation ( Ares ) pursuant to which Ares agreed to provide a $100 million second lien term loan (the Second Lien Facility ) in a single draw on the closing date in connection with the Transaction. The Amended 2018 Credit Agreement is subject to customary conditions, including, among others (i) the accuracy of certain specified representations and warranties; (ii) the absence of certain specified events of default under the 2018 Credit Agreement; (iii) the simultaneous funding of the Second Lien Facility in an amount sufficient to pay our closing cash purchase price obligations under the Master Transaction Agreement and (iv) the Transaction having been consummated (or substantially simultaneously with the initial borrowing under the Second Lien Facility, having been consummated) substantially in accordance with the terms of the Master Transaction Agreement. The terms of the Amended 2018 Credit Agreement will remain substantially similar as those set forth in the 2018 Credit Agreement, with the changes outlined in the First Lien Consent to permit (i) the reduction of the aggregate revolving credit commitments under the 2018 Credit Agreement from $100 million to $75 million, (ii) the consummation of the Transaction and (iii) the incurrence of the Second Lien Facility. The First Lien Consent requires that the Transaction be consummated on or prior to March 31, 2019. The obligations of Ares under the Second Lien Commitment Letter are subject to customary conditions, including, among others (i) the accuracy of certain specified representations and warranties; (ii) the Transaction having been consummated (or substantially simultaneously with the initial borrowing under the Second Lien Facility, having been consummated) substantially in accordance with the terms of the Master Transaction Agreement; (iii) the absence of any PS Spine material adverse effect and (iv) the execution and delivery of definitive loan documentation prepared in accordance with documentation principles agreed to by us and Ares. The Second Lien Commitment Letter expires upon the earlier of (i) 500 p.m. New York time on March 31, 2019; (ii) the consummation of the Transaction and (iii) the funding of the Second Lien Facility on the closing date. The proceeds of the Second Lien Facility may be used solely to pay the cash portion of the purchase price under the Master Transaction Agreement, and amounts borrowed under the Second Lien Facility and repaid may not be re borrowed. The Second Lien Commitment Letter provides that the terms of the Second Lien Facility will be finalized in a credit agreement (the Second Lien Credit Agreement ) and related documentation to be entered into prior to the closing of the Transaction. The Second Lien Facility will mature six months after the maturity date of the Amended 2018 Credit Agreement. We will pay interest on the unpaid principal amount of the Second Lien Facility at a rate per annum, at our election, equal to either the prime rate plus an applicable margin to be set forth in the Second Lien Credit Agreement or the London Interbank Offered Rate ( LIBOR ) plus an applicable margin to be set forth in the Second Lien Credit Agreement. The principal amount of the loans outstanding under the Second Lien Facility will be subject to certain customary mandatory prepayments, including, without limitation, an excess cash flow sweep, upon the issuance of additional indebtedness and the consummation of certain asset dispositions. Additionally, the Second Lien Credit Agreement will contain customary (i) representations and warranties, including (but not limited to) certain corporate and organization matters; financial condition; properties; litigation; compliance with laws; certain regulatory matters; taxes; employee benefits matters; material agreements; solvency; and insurance, (ii) affirmative covenants, including (but not limited to) certain reporting and notice obligations; maintenance of corporate existence; conduct of business; compliance with laws; use of proceeds; insurance and further assurances, (iii) negative covenants, including (but not limited to) the incurrence certain additional indebtedness; creation of certain liens; sale and leaseback transactions; consolidations or mergers with, or conveyances, transfers or leases of all or substantially all of its assets to another person; investments, loans, advances, guarantees and acquisitions; payment of dividends and distributions; transactions with affiliates and amendments to material documents and (iv) events of default, including (but not limited to) failure to make required payments; inaccuracy of representations and warranties; failure to comply with covenants; cross default to other material indebtedness; failure to stay execution of judgments; bankruptcy or insolvency; actual or asserted invalidity or impairment of the credit documentation; invalidity of subordination provisions; and a change 24 Table of Contents of control, in each case substantially similar to those in the 2018 Credit Agreement, with changes as are necessary to account for the Second Lien Facility, the consummation of the Transaction, and as otherwise agreed between us and Ares. Under the Second Lien Facility, we will also be subject to a total net leverage maintenance covenant and minimum fixed charge coverage covenant to be set forth in the Second Lien Credit Agreement. The obligations under the Second Lien Facility will be guaranteed on a joint and several basis by each of our direct or indirect wholly owned subsidiaries, subject to customary exceptions. The obligations under the Second Lien Facility will be secured on a second lien priority basis (behind the Amended 2018 Credit Agreement) by substantially all of our assets and each guarantor party thereto, subject to customary exceptions. Our level of indebtedness could adversely affect our ability to raise additional capital to fund our operations. Our level of indebtedness may limit our ability to react to changes in the economy or our industry and prevent us from meeting our obligations under the agreements relating to our indebtedness. Any acquisitions, strategic investments, divestures, mergers or joint ventures we make may require the issuance of a significant amount of equity or debt securities and may not be scientifically or commercially successful. As part of our business strategy, we intend to make certain acquisitions to obtain additional businesses, product and or process technologies, capabilities and personnel. If we make 1 or more significant acquisitions in which the consideration includes securities, we may be required to issue a substantial amount of equity, debt, warrants, convertible instruments or other similar securities. Such an issuance could dilute your investment in our common stock or increase our interest expense and other expenses. Our long term strategy may include identifying and acquiring, investing in or merging with suitable candidates on acceptable terms, divesting of certain business lines or activities or entering into joint ventures. In particular, over time, we may acquire, make investments in, or merge with providers of product offerings that complement our business or may terminate such activities. Mergers, acquisitions and divestitures include a number of risks and present financial, managerial and operational challenges, including but not limited to Further, acquisitions involve a number of operational risks, such as difficulty and expense of assimilating the operations, technology and personnel of the acquired business; our inability to retain the management, key personnel and other employees of the acquired business; our inability to maintain the acquired company relationship with customers and key third parties, such as alliance partners; exposure to legal claims for activities of the acquired business prior to the acquisition; the potential need to implement financial and other systems and add management resources; the potential for internal control deficiencies in the internal controls of the acquired operations; potential inexperience in a business area that is either new to us or more significant to us than prior to the acquisition; the diversion of our management attention from our core business; the potential impairment of goodwill and write off of in process research and development costs, adversely affecting our reported results of operations; and increased costs to integrate or, in the case of a divestiture or joint venture, separate the technology, personnel, customer base and business practices of the acquired or divested business or assets. Any 1 of these risks could prevent an acquisition, strategic investment, divesture, merger or joint venture from being scientifically or commercially successful, which could have a material impact on our results of operations, and financial condition. The announcement and pendency of the acquisition of Paradigm Spine, LLC may adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations, the business, financial condition and results of operations of Paradigm Spine, LLC and, consequently, if the Transaction is consummated, the combined company. Subject to the terms and conditions of the Master Transaction Agreement, dated November 1, 2018, by and among the Company, PS Spine Holdco, LLC ( PS Spine ), Bears Holding Sub, Inc. ( Holdco ) and Bears Merger Sub, Inc. ( Merger Sub ) (the Master Transaction Agreement ), (i) PS Spine shall contribute all of the issued and outstanding membership 25 Table of Contents interests of Paradigm Spine, LLC ( Paradigm ) to Holdco (the Contribution ), (ii) Merger Sub shall be merged with and into the Company, with the Company surviving as a wholly owned subsidiary of Holdco (the Merger ) and (iii) Holdco shall be renamed RTI Surgical Holdings, Inc. (the Transaction ). Uncertainty about the effect of the Transaction on employees, customers, suppliers, third party distributors and other parties may have an adverse effect on our businesses, financial conditions and results of operations and Paradigm businesses, financial conditions and results of operations, regardless of whether the Transaction is completed, and may have an adverse effect on the business, financial condition and results of operations of the combined company if the Transaction is completed. These risks include the following, all of which could be exacerbated by a delay in the completion of the Transaction the impairment of our ability to attract, retain and motivate current and prospective employees, including key personnel; and the impairment of Paradigm ability to attract, retain and motivate current and prospective employees, including key personnel the diversion of significant time and resources of our management and Paradigm management; difficulties maintaining relationships with our customers, suppliers, third party distributors and other business partners; difficulties maintaining relationships with Paradigm customers, suppliers, third party distributors and other business partners delays or deferments of certain business decisions by our customers, suppliers, third party distributors and other business partners and Paradigm customers, suppliers, third party distributors and other business partners; Our inability to pursue alternative business opportunities or make appropriate changes to our businesses because of requirements in the Master Transaction Agreement that we conduct our businesses in all material respects in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice and not engage in certain activities prior to the completion of the Transaction; Paradigm inability to pursue alternative business opportunities or make appropriate changes to its businesses because of requirements in the Master Transaction Agreement that it conduct its businesses in all material respects in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice and not engage in certain activities prior to the completion of the Transaction; any litigation relating to the Transaction and the costs related thereto; and the incurrence of significant costs, expenses and fees for professional services and other transaction costs in connection with the Transaction. Failure to consummate the Transaction within the expected timeframe or at all could have a material adverse impact on our business, financial condition and results of operations, and consequently, if the Transaction is consummated, the combined company. There can be no assurance that the Transaction will occur within the expected timeframe or at all. Consummation of the Transaction is subject to specified conditions, including the accuracy of the representations and warranties of the parties and compliance by the parties with their respective obligations under the Master Transaction Agreement, in each case subject to certain materiality qualifiers; the written consent of PS Spine unitholders approving the Master Transaction Agreement and the transactions contemplated thereby, including the Contribution; the receipt of approval of our stockholders; the absence of any law or order in effect that prevents, makes unlawful or prohibits the consummation of the Transaction; the absence of any material adverse effect on our business, condition (financial or otherwise) or results of operations, subject to certain exceptions, since November 1, 2018, the date of the Master Transaction Agreement; the absence of any material adverse effect on the business, condition (financial or otherwise) or results of operations, subject to certain exceptions, of Paradigm and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole, since November 1, 26 Table of Contents 2018, the date of the Master Transaction Agreement; the amount of cash consideration paid in connection with the Transaction being equal to or greater than $0; the shares of Holdco common stock issuable pursuant to the Merger and shares of Holdco common stock representing the amount of stock to be issued to in connection with the Transaction at its closing (the Stock Consideration Amount ) being approved for listing on the Nasdaq Global Market, subject to official notice of issuance; the receipt of representation letters from our officers and officers of Holdco and PS Spine regarding the intended tax treatment of the Transaction (provided this condition will be deemed not to be satisfied if (i) Sidley Austin or Dorsey & Whitney, as the case may be, delivers an opinion that, as a result of a change in law occurring after November 1, 2018, it is unable to provide an opinion to the effect that the Merger and the Contribution, taken together, will qualify as a transaction described in Section 351 of the Code (and, in the case of Sidley Austin, that the Merger will not qualify as a reorganization within the meaning of Section 368(a) of the Code) and (ii) we or PS Spine, as the case may be, is unable to obtain such opinion from an alternative tax counsel); neither Marc Viscogliosi nor Francis Magee rescinding his obligations under his applicable consulting agreement with us, and we do not rescind our obligations under those consulting agreements; n1 of Viscogliosi Brothers, LLC, HealthCor Paradigm Blocker Company 2, Inc. and HealthCor AIV, L.P. rescinding its obligations under its applicable non competition agreement with Holdco; and n1 of the parties to that certain agreement between PS Spine, Paradigm, and certain of Paradigm lenders (the Settlement Agreement ) rescinding their obligations under the Settlement Agreement, the Settlement Agreement being in full force and effect and not having been amended in any manner adverse to us, Holdco or Merger Sub and the transactions contemplated by the Settlement Agreement having been performed in accordance with the terms of the Settlement Agreement. We cannot provide any assurances that these conditions will be satisfied in a timely manner or at all or that the Transaction will occur. In addition, the Master Transaction Agreement contains certain termination rights, including (i) for us and PS Spine if the Transaction is not consummated on or prior to January 31, 2019 (if the Transaction has not been consummated on or prior to [January 31, 2019] (as it may be extended, the outside date ), the outside date may be extended by us to February 28, 2019 and if the closing has not occurred by February 28, 2019, the outside date may be extended by us to March 31, 2019 (which extensions we intend to exercise, as necessary)); (ii) for us and PS Spine if the approval of the holders of a majority of the outstanding shares of RTI common stock and preferred stock (on a fully converted basis) entitled to vote thereon and the written consent of a majority of the outstanding shares of RTI preferred stock, voting separately as a class (collectively, the Required Merger Proposal Vote ) is not obtained at our special meeting, or any adjournment or postp1ment thereof; (iii) for us if the PS Spine written consent is not provided to us within five business days following the effectiveness of the registration statement on Form S 4 and (iv) for us if our board changes its recommendation that our stockholders vote to approve the proposals contained in the definitive proxy statement filed on Schedule 14A with SEC on February 7, 2019, provided that PS Spine may not terminate pursuant to this clause if the Required Merger Proposal Vote has been obtained. In addition, satisfying the conditions to the Transaction may take longer, and could cost more, than we and Paradigm expect. The occurrence of any of these events individually or in combination may adversely affect the benefits we and Paradigm expect to achieve from the Transaction and the trading prices of, prior to the consummation of the Transaction, our shares and, following the consummation of the Transaction, Holdco shares. In addition, if the Transaction does not close, the attention of our management and Paradigm management will have been diverted to the consummation of the Transaction, rather than their respective operations and pursuit of other opportunities, in certain circumstances we would be required to pay a reverse termination fee equal to $4.5 million or $9.0 million to PS Spine and we and Paradigm may suffer reputational or other harm due to the adverse perception of any failure to successfully complete the Transaction. Competition authorities may take certain actions in connection with the Transaction under applicable antitrust laws, including enjoining consummation of the Transaction. Under the Hart Scott Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976 (the HSR Act ) and the rules that have been promulgated thereunder by the U.S. Federal Trade Commission (the FTC ), certain transactions may not be consummated unless information has been furnished to the Antitrust Division of the Department of Justice (the Antitrust Division ) and the FTC and certain waiting period requirements have been satisfied. The Transaction is subject to these requirements and may not be completed until the expiration of a 30 day waiting period following the filing of the required notification and 27 Table of Contents report forms with the Antitrust Division and the FTC or until early termination is granted. On November 13, 2018, Holdco and PS Spine filed the required forms under the HSR Act with the Antitrust Division and the FTC and requested early termination, which was granted on November 26, 2018. Even though early termination has been granted under the HSR Act, at any time before or after consummation of the Transaction, notwithstanding such termination, the applicable competition authorities could take such action under applicable antitrust laws as each deems necessary or desirable in the public interest, including seeking to enjoin the consummation of the Transaction. We may be the target of securities class action and derivative lawsuits which could result in substantial costs and may delay or prevent the Transaction from being completed. Securities class action lawsuits and derivative lawsuits are often brought against companies that have entered into merger agreements or other business combinations. Even if the lawsuits are without merit, defending against these claims can result in substantial costs and divert management time and resources. An adverse judgment could result in m1tary damages, which could have a negative impact on our liquidity and financial condition. Additionally, if a plaintiff is successful in obtaining an injunction prohibiting the closing of the Transaction, then that injunction may delay or prevent the Transaction from being consummated, which may adversely affect our business, financial position and results of operation. Our stockholders will have a reduced ownership and voting interest after the Transaction and will exercise less influence over management. The Holdco shares that our stockholders receive in the Transaction in exchange for our shares will represent a percentage ownership of Holdco that is smaller than such stockholder percentage ownership of us. If the Transaction occurs, 10,729,614 shares of common stock of Holdco will be issued at closing as partial consideration for the Contribution. A significant portion of these shares will be used, along with cash that would otherwise be paid at closing, to pay the amounts outstanding under Paradigm existing senior secured credit agreement. Assuming (i) the closing occurs on March 15, 2019; (ii) 62,245,112 shares of our common stock (based on the number of shares outstanding as of January 15, 2019) and 50,000 shares of our preferred stock are issued and outstanding immediately prior to the effective time and (iii) the amount of cash paid to the lenders under Paradigm existing senior secured credit agreement at closing does not exceed $95.0 million, and taking into account the $30 million Paradigm borrowed from the lenders under its existing senior secured credit agreement on December 6, 2018, approximately 85.30% of the issued and outstanding Holdco common stock and 100% of the issued and outstanding Holdco preferred stock immediately following the closing will be held by our former stockholders, approximately 6.42% of the issued and outstanding Holdco common stock immediately following the closing will be held by PS Spine and approximately 8.28% of the issued and outstanding Holdco common stock immediately following the closing will be held by the lenders under Paradigm existing senior secured credit agreement and their affiliates. Using the same assumptions set forth above and assuming the conversion of our preferred stock, immediately following the closing, former holders of our common stock and our preferred stock will collectively hold 87.37% of the voting power of Holdco, PS Spine will hold 5.51% of the voting power of Holdco and the lenders under Paradigm existing senior secured credit agreement and their affiliates will hold 7.12% of the voting power of Holdco. As a result of this reduced ownership percentage, our former stockholders will have less influence on the management and policies of Holdco than they now have with respect to us. The lenders under Paradigm existing senior secured credit agreement and their affiliates may receive a smaller or larger portion of the Stock Consideration Amount than as assumed for purposes of this example. If the lenders under Paradigm existing senior secured credit agreement and their affiliates receive a larger portion of the Stock Consideration Amount than as assumed for purposes of this example, the percentage of the issued and outstanding Holdco common stock immediately following the closing that will be held by the lenders under Paradigm existing senior secured credit agreement and their affiliates will be greater than set forth in this example and the percentage that will be held by PS Spine will be less than set forth in this example. If the lenders under Paradigm existing senior secured credit agreement and their affiliates receive a smaller portion of the Stock Consideration Amount than as assumed for purposes of this example, the percentage of the issued and outstanding Holdco common stock immediately following the closing that will be held by the lenders under Paradigm existing senior secured credit agreement and their affiliates will be less than set forth in this example and the percentage that will be held by PS Spine will be greater than set forth in this example. In addition, the earnout provisions of the Master Transaction Agreement provide for the possibility that PS Spine may receive additional shares of Holdco common stock, which would cause our former stockholders ownership of Holdco to be further diluted. The combined company may fail to realize the anticipated benefits of the Transaction. The success of the Transaction will depend on, among other things, the combined company ability to combine our business with Paradigm business in a manner that facilitates growth opportunities, including with respect to the acceleration of reimbursement of coflex , and realizing anticipated cost synergies and performance improvements. However, the combined company must successfully combine our business with Paradigm business in a manner that permits these anticipated cost synergies and performance improvements to be realized. In addition, the combined company must achieve the anticipated synergies and improvements without adversely affecting current revenues and 28 Table of Contents investments in future growth. If the combined company is not able to successfully achieve these objectives, the anticipated benefits of the Transaction may not be realized fully or at all or may take longer to realize than expected. The failure to integrate successfully certain of our businesses and operations with Paradigm in the expected time frame may adversely affect the combined company future results. Historically, we have operated as an independent company from Paradigm, and we will continue to do so until the completion of the Transaction. The management of the combined company may face significant challenges in integrating and consolidating certain of our businesses and the functions with Paradigm, integrating our technologies, organizations, procedures, policies and operations, addressing differences in the business cultures of the 2 companies and retaining key personnel. The integration may also be complex and time consuming, and require substantial resources and effort. The integration process and other disruptions resulting from the Transaction may also disrupt our ongoing business or cause inconsistencies in our standards, controls, procedures and policies, as well as Paradigm s, that adversely affect the combined company relationships with employees, suppliers, customers and others with whom we and Paradigm have business or other dealings or limit the combined company ability to achieve the anticipated benefits of the Transaction. In addition, difficulties in integrating our business or regulatory functions with those of Paradigm could harm the reputation of the combined company. Item 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS. N1 Item 2 Item 2 PROPERTIES. 
